The goods cost less than 20 euros.
The fee is equivalent to 40% of the value of the goods...
I'm a #PRS_ORG# big customer, so it's not a problem for me.
I only need a number or instructions as to what I should include with the package so that it can be tracked by you as a return.
I ordered the #PRS_ORG# a few days ago... for 249€.
Today, it costs 179€.
I find that to be very annoying, to be honest.
Do I need to cancel the order and re-order for the better price, or is there another way to get a credit?
I also find, in general, that children should not be expected to take on a parental role for their younger siblings.
However, I think it's also good for older siblings to take care of the little ones in moderation.
A quick look, a quick help, bring the bottle, etc.
In this way, they learn responsibility, help in the family, and are involved.
As long as they can still be children themselves, I see no problem with that.
If your K1 is occupied for a short time on his own and it's OK for him, that's good.
You will be the best judge of whether this is suitable for your children.
It's not as if he is supposed to wrap K2 and accompany him for hours while he falls asleep.
From a legal point of view, it is probably questionable.
Perhaps that is why the psychologist made the statement.
Because if something were to actually happen like a fire, a break-in, an earthquake, an alien invasion etc., it would actually be too much responsibility for K1 to take care of K2.
Whether this is a risk you want to take is, of course, up to you ;)
Please help me find the title of a book!
I remember reading a crime/thriller a few years ago and although I can remember almost the entire plot, I can't remember the title for the life of me, maybe someone here knows...
The story was about fear and how to deal with it.
At the beginning of the story, a zookeeper commits suicide by covering himself in food and going into the enclosure with his big cats.
The case is taken over by a police commissioner, who, after a short investigation, comes to his therapist, who runs a clinic where he treats anxious patients.
The commissioner has a little niece who also has a fear (of fire) and ends up with this therapist.
There are more suicides and there is another protagonist - a photographer who is hired anonymously before every suicide to go to the scene of the suicide and document and post the photos on the internet.
In any case, it turns out that this therapist is running a kind of underground therapy group where patients are implanted with a chip that suppresses an anxiety center in the brain, and the patients end up facing their fears in the most extreme way.
(A woman jumps out of a window, another drives herself to death on purpose)
This is called "the fight" in the book.
In the end, there's a big showdown in the clinic that had to do with a fire.
That's the rough plot I'm pretty sure the book was originally written by a French author/writer.
If this action is known to anyone, or even if someone can tell me the title of the book, I would be very happy.
Oh dear, I don't have the password for the Wi-Fi.
I'll have to contact my husband first.
This can take some time, however.
What steps do I need to take after that?
Is it also possible to get the price difference refunded?
4-year-old child, splinter under the thumb nail
A four-year-old child has wood splinters over the entire length under the thumb nail (outside).
They tried to pull him out with tweezers.
Very difficult to grasp.
It didn't work and it hurt.
Now the child reacts hysterically when we try.
There's no chance anymore.
Tomorrow I go to the doctor.
All Bosch power tools, compressed air tools and measuring tools are carefully inspected, tested and subject to the strict controls of Bosch quality assurance.
Bosch therefore offers a guarantee for Bosch power tools, air tools and measuring tools.
The buyer's warranty claims under the sales contract with the seller, as well as statutory rights, are not restricted by this guarantee.
We guarantee these tools according to the following conditions:
We provide guarantee in accordance with the following regulations (No. 2 - 7) by rectifying any defects in the tool free of charge, which are proven to be caused by a material or manufacturing fault within the guarantee period.
The guarantee period is 24 months, for commercial or professional use or comparable use 12 months.
The warranty period starts with the purchase by the first end-user.
The date on the original invoice is decisive.
For all commercial blue power tools and measuring tools purchased from 01.09.2004 (with the exception of high frequency tools, industrial battery-powered screwdrivers and pneumatic tools) the warranty period is extended to 36 months if the buyer registers these tools within 4 weeks of the purchase date.
Battery packs and chargers, as well as included accessories, are excluded from this warranty extension.
Registration can only be done online at www.bosch-pt.com/warranty.
The registration document, which must be printed immediately, as well as the original purchase receipt, from which the date of purchase can be derived, will serve as confirmation.
Registration is only possible if the buyer agrees to the storage of the data to be entered there.
Excluded from the warranty are: parts subject to normal or other natural wear and tear, as well as defects in the tool caused by normal or other natural use, anomalous environmental conditions, improper operating conditions, overloading or lack of maintenance or care.
Defects in the tool caused by the use of accessories, add-on or replacement parts that are not genuine Bosch parts.
Tools on which changes or additions have been made.
Minor deviations from the ideal condition, which are insignificant for the value and usability of the tool.
The rectification of the defect recognised by us as being covered by the guarantee is carried out in such a way that we will either repair the defective tool free of charge or replace it with a defect-free tool (possibly also a successor model).
Replaced tools or parts become our property.
When did the deadline run out?
According to the Distance Selling Act, I have a right of withdrawal of 1 month.
The LokSound 5 is the most important member of the LokSound family.
With the combination of digital decoder and sound module on a circuit board, we achieve dimensions of only 30mm x 15.5mm and can therefore be installed in almost every H0 and 0 gauge locomotive.
The LokSound 5 decoders are offered with all common interfaces and always come with a 11x15mm "sugar cube" loudspeaker and a sound capsule kit.
Like all members of the family, the LokSound5 is a true multi-protocol decoder.
It can handle the DCC data format as well as Motorola®, Selectrix® and M4.
In the DCC format, 14 to 128 speed steps are as self-evident as 2- and 4-digit addresses and up to 32 functions.
Thanks to RailComPlus®, the decoders automatically connect to a suitable digital central station.
It supports all DCC programming modes, and thanks to RailCom®, the CV values can be read on the main track with suitable central units.
For central units that can only program CVs from 1-255, auxiliary registers exist.
Motorola® users benefit from up to 28 channels at 255 addresses.
Three more Motorola® addresses allow 16 functions to be triggered.
A built-in programming mode also makes it possible to reprogram the venerable Control Unit 6021.
The M4 protocol enables automatic registration with mfx®-compatible central units.
The LokSound 5 decoder recognises Märklin® braking tracks as well as ZIMO® HLU braking commands or the Lenz® ABC system.
It is also possible to brake with DCC brakes or with direct current.
Furthermore, it also stops at a Selectrix® brake diode.
An ABC pendulum automatic allows the automatic pendulation between two stations.
The LokSound 5 decoder can be used on analogue DC and AC tracks.
Since my coupon is not being kindly extended after a complaint, which did not reach me, I will cancel my order, which is worth about
Remove #NUMBER#€ from my cart and order elsewhere, where customer service is a priority and I don't have to type my fingers to the bone to achieve nothing!!
What am I supposed to do with this number?
Because of Omicron: Johnson wants to push booster shots
New Omicron cases are causing headaches for politics and science in the UK.
Therefore, all adults in England who are eligible are to receive a vaccination offer by New Year's Day.
London – British Prime Minister Boris Johnson wants to speed up the Corona booster vaccinations in the face of rapidly rising Omicron figures.
Every adult in England should have the opportunity to receive a booster dose by the end of the year, as long as at least three months have passed since their second dose, Johnson said in a pre-recorded video message to his fellow countrymen on Sunday evening.
So far, the target date was the end of January.
The UK government will provide additional support to speed up the vaccination programmes in the devolved nations of Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland.
In the face of the Omicron variant, we are facing an emergency, which is why it is urgently necessary to strengthen vaccination protection, said Johnson.
The good news is that the protection level can be increased again with a third vaccination.
"Get boosted now!" Johnson said.
Another 1,239 Omicron cases were recorded in the UK on Sunday, taking the total to 3,137.
That was an increase of 65 percent compared to the previous day. dpa
Will the full amount be refunded from the purchase price when picked up?
I'm in favour of everyone introducing themselves with pronouns
I sent in an application.
Today, the invitation to a conversation came by email.
I want to respond to the email.
Unfortunately, the name is not "Peter", but a somewhat more complicated name.
I googled it and depending on the cultural background it is either a man or a woman.
**I have no idea how to write the email now.
Can someone please help me?
**I'm a foreigner, and I don't want to step on the toes of officials.
Conclusion: everyone should introduce themselves with pronouns.
I have a total of 5 books on it.
4 of them go.
Only the one I bought today doesn't work
Clearly, the chair had a hidden defect at the time of sale.
How can such a cushion damage occur otherwise after 9 months?
First on #PRS_ORG#.
However, this has been the case for about.
Less than 14 days.
Therefore, I have always bought the last books via the website and then read them on the #PRS_ORG#.
I bought 6 #PRS_ORG# and wanted to buy 8.
But there were none left.
They are now available again and I would like you to please add 2 chairs to my order and charge me for them.
[CW] The feeling of not being able to help.
Content warning: I'm going to write about domestic violence in some detail here.
I just need to get something off my chest.
I (21) often come into contact with the victims (and perpetrators) of domestic violence for professional reasons.
A topic that really gnaws at me and unfortunately occurs all too often is that many victims do not allow themselves to be helped or think that we cannot help them.
I am well aware that we cannot do everything and that it is not perfect.
But there are fewer things in my profession that move me more than when I can't do anything in such situations.
I see the bruises, the blood, the desperate eyes...
But even in a conversation under four eyes, with the perpetrator far out of sight and hearing, I cannot reach everyone.
I don't know what the reason is, maybe it's fear, fear of revenge, fear of leaving the familiar social environment, fear of taking the children out of it.
What I always try to make clear to everyone, sometimes even very close to tears, is that everyone deserves to be able to live without violence.
I want all women to know that they don't have to just put up with violence.
I often wish I could help in any way, but I know I can't.
However, it will never get any easier.
Please, always remember that you are worth living without violence, that is so unbelievably important.
"Arcane" on Netflix: What is the series based on "League of Legends" worth?
A lot of fantasy, a lot of complicated names, a breathtaking design: "Arcane", the series from the "League of Legends" computer game universe, was recently launched on Netflix.
Why are we looking forward to the already announced two seasons?
Basketball Bundesliga: Derby disaster for the MHP Riesen Ludwigsburg at the Merlins Crailsheim
At least on youngster Johannes Patrick, one could rely.
Nothing again: For the second time within less than three months, the giants lost in Crailsheim - and how!
Before the game, Ludwigsburg's coach John Patrick had said, looking back on the cup defeat in early October against the Hakro Merlins Crailsheim: "We still have some anger in our bellies."
But after the game, it didn't calm down - but instead increased in the face of the 61:72 (28:38) defeat in the Basketball Bundesliga.
Mind you, more than the bare result was disappointing in the manner of the performance.
As an example, a statistic is mentioned that expresses the entire dilemma: The three-point percentage was only 13 percent, 4 hits (all of them by the young Johannes Patrick) at no less than 31 attempts - any questions?
John Patrick provided the answer: "We just weren't focused enough after the win in Tenerife and didn't implement what we trained".
Namely, to move the ball.
His opponent Sebastian Gleim reacted differently: "A great game to win for the second time against Ludwigsburg," said the happy coach.
"It felt like 10,000 people."
On Saturday, only 750 visitors were admitted to the Hohenlohe Arena, but they got their money's worth.
Not least because of BBL top scorer T.J. Shorts, who marked 22 points and steered the game of his team.
"The best playmaker I've ever trained," Gleim praised.
While in Patrick's team, the top performers like Jordan Hulls (0 points) and Jonah Radebaugh (7) failed across the board.
Only in the last quarter (22:15) did the Giants prevent a total debacle and came within eight points, after they were already 39:59 behind.
In addition to Johannes Patrick, Justin Simon scored twelve points.
Fortunately, there isn't much time to argue.
Already on Wednesday (7 p.m.), the Giants will host the Skyliners Frankfurt, in front of then also a maximum of 750 spectators in Ludwigsburg.
We used to have a different email address, but I changed it.
Yes, I signed up a few months ago.
Unfortunately, all warranty claims were rejected.
We have sought legal advice again and have written to them again for this reason.
We originally signed up half a year ago.
Always like from the egg: Max Raabe turns 59
He is able to captivate his audience with new interpretations of hits from the 1920s and 1930s.
Currently, he is on tour with the programme "Hello, dear luck" - if he is allowed to perform.
Actually, Max Raabe wanted to celebrate his birthday on the stage in Leipzig this Sunday.
But nothing comes of it.
The planned concert has been moved to May 2022 - "at the request of the authorities", to curb the spread of the coronavirus.
Other of his performances scheduled for the Advent season will also have to be cancelled for the time being, as it says on the website of the singer, who turns 59 today, and his musicians (www.palast-orchester.de).
From January, the artists want to catch up on their already postponed dates due to the pandemic in 2020.
Max Raabe was born on December 12, 1962 in Lünen in North Rhine-Westphalia. As a child, he sang a lot and with great pleasure.
In Berlin, he studied opera singing, in 1986, he founded the Palace Orchestra together with fellow students.
Since then, the baritone has established himself with his repertoire of schlager songs and chansons in the style of the Comedian Harmonists.
He was awarded many prizes.
His live album from the "MTV Unplugged" series (2019) reached - just like his successful album "Für Frauen ist das kein Problem" (2013) - second place in the charts.
He made it from the niche to the mainstream.
Always elegantly dressed, with his blonde hair carefully combed back, and mindful of etiquette, Max Raabe is no longer to be found on the current German-speaking music scene.
Since 2020, he has been on tour with the programme "Guten Tag, liebes Glück". dpa
Hello #NAME#, is it also possible to get a small sample of the furniture wood in advance?
It can be matched with existing furniture and so we can check in advance whether it fits the colour scheme
It still doesn't work. I can only long for the cover but not turn the pages.
Federal Minister of Building Klara Geywitz: Expropriation does not create a new apartment
The new Federal Minister of Construction, Klara Geywitz (SPD), has spoken out against the expropriation of large housing companies, as requested in a referendum in Berlin.
"With expropriation, not a single new apartment is created, only the ownership structure changes," said Geywitz in an interview with the "Tagesspiegel" (Sunday).
My aim is to give tenants security that their rent will remain affordable in the years to come.
By the way, a colourful mix of private landlords, cooperatives and housing associations is the best protection against the formation of a monopoly.
In Berlin, the coalition of SPD, Greens and Left Party wants to set up an expert commission on how to deal with the result of the referendum.
However, if the situation does not improve, Geywitz has not ruled out talks with the FDP in the Ampel coalition on further tightening of rental law.
The coalition agreement foresees a rent cap until 2029, a limitation of rent increases in tight housing markets, and the extension of the rent index.
I will speak to the Justice Secretary to get this implemented as quickly as possible.
If the rental market does not ease, "we will talk to our coalition partners about further steps," stressed the SPD politician.
Hello, I wanted to order something and after a few days I noticed that I forgot the last step in payment.
Unfortunately, the product is no longer available.
Do they know when it will be back in stock?
Or whether it will come back at all?
#PRS_ORG# with storage space (180 x #NUMBER# cm),
Voucher sounds great
Then I redeem it when I place a new order
Thank you for the quick clarification!
If the lamp is sent in March, how long does the delivery itself take?
I've already cut myself on my finger
That is absolute cheek
At least 100 people killed by tornadoes in Kentucky
A devastating storm system has spawned numerous tornadoes across the United States.
In Kentucky alone, more than 100 fatalities could be reported.
The pictures from there remind one of a war zone.
In the night from Friday to Saturday, several tornadoes wreaked havoc in the USA and may have killed up to one hundred people.
The storms left a path of destruction about 200 miles long, especially in the state of Kentucky.
Its governor, Andy Beshear, said after a visit to the disaster area that everything was gone where the tornado had ripped through.
Houses, shops, government buildings - just gone.
Parts of industrial facilities, roofs are in the trees.
It is hard to imagine that this is even possible.
He estimates that there could be up to a hundred deaths in the state of Kentucky alone, and the official figures are rising by the hour.
Hi, I just saw that they're sold out of display #NAME#.
That is very sad.
Is it still being produced?
Or has it been removed from the range altogether?
Is it possible to order this showcase in another country?
When do you check out?
If the delivery cannot be made to my home, I must cancel the order!
I understand that, but can I now order the ceiling and have it delivered to Germany, which is in the shopping cart?
I had returned an article or requested a return via the contact form and wanted to ask if it arrived or was processed, as I had not yet received confirmation.
Companies pay vaccine incentives, change advertising slogans
While the federal government continues to reject proposals for a vaccination bonus, companies in Austria have taken the initiative themselves and are offering their employees money bonuses for vaccination.
Thus, they are in line with the social partners ÖGB and the Chamber of Commerce, who today called for financial incentives for vaccination.
Even the transformation of advertising slogans into calls for vaccination - following the German model - should increase the willingness to be vaccinated against Corona.
He has joined a company that he has gossiped about.
That doesn't make his situation any better than yours.
Wait and drink tea.
It's been a year.
He hasn't tied himself down to his old job, apparently, and has been looking for something else.
You can do that, too.
And that he didn't like you back then: eh, who cares.
After all, he didn't like his job either.
There are too many variables.
Please accept the cancellation.
This will then be legally relevant.
I make a screen-shot.
Good day - I am interested in the Boone Dining Table, White.
Does it also come in 230cm?
We offer all Smeg kitchen appliances and the corresponding accessories in our online shop kitchenpoint.de.
We generally check the quality and completeness of your order.
Smeg's new coffee machine brings freshly ground coffee to your kitchen or office.
The simple, reduced design, the plastic surface in matt colours in combination with the matt-brushed stainless steel front make the new SMEG fully automatic coffee machine with milk frother a design object.
According to the reduced design, all functions such as grind size and water amount, as well as the choice between espresso, Americano, Ristretto or a mild coffee, can be selected with only four buttons.
Thanks to the steam lance, coffee-milk and milk-foam specialities can also be made.
Help with first own campaign
Welcome, Boron!
I am currently running the adventure Over the Griffon's Saddle for a group of 4 friends, and would like to seamlessly bring my heroes into a custom-written campaign for the players.
We are playing DSA 5.
The big arc is made, the villains and their motivations written, the individual acts thought up, and now I'm in the process of writing the introductory adventure and I'm already stumbling over my own feet at the first encounter.
The premise is that the heroes are to take a wagon of grain from Gratenfels to a small village near the Thuran Sea.
That's where the further action is supposed to take place.
Some miles from the village, the heroes are ambushed by a group of goblins who lure them into an ambush.
I want to give the player-characters the opportunity to resolve the conflict in different ways: Persuading, acting, threatening, recognizing the danger early, whatever the players come up with.
Group size: 8 common goblins, 2 with spears, 6 armed with bows and swords
If undetected, the goblins lie in wait for the heroes in a hollow way, and flank the wagon, three on each side armed with bows, while two stop the wagon with spears.
Should it come to the fight and the heroes lose, I have two solutions
1. The heroes are all knocked unconscious and subsequently found and healed by the village schoolmaster's son, a half-elf.
The cart is, of course, gone.
2. If a defeat is inevitable, this half-elf steps in with two of his servants to help the heroes in battle.
The cart is still there, everything is great.
How do you find Deus ex Machina of solution 2?
Is the encounter too much of an introduction to the adventure?
The group of Goblins will later play a decisive role, so they are not just cannon fodder.
EDIT: Wow, I didn't expect so many answers, especially not so many great suggestions and tips.
I'm going to take on board a lot of your ideas and I have more faith in my narratives now.
I took the lamp apart again.
And again stuck together.
Unfortunately, it still doesn't work.
That's why I would still like to send them back.
Can you then send me the returns, then I can pack the lamp and bring it to #PRS_ORG#.
Save shipping costs and time - and save the environment at the same time!
If you need more than one article, please click "Pay now" only after you have added all articles to the shopping cart.
Therefore, the combined shipping is automatically calculated, and you will receive everything in one package.
By doing this, you save yourself the trouble of multiple purchases/payments and the environment is happy because no unnecessary shipping material and unnecessary fuel is used for the delivery of multiple packages.
Faster shipping with DHL, DPD and Deutsche Post!
Normally, we will dispatch your order, if payment is received by 14:00, on the same working day.
To ensure that your package arrives as quickly as possible, please make sure that your address is complete and that your name is on your mailbox and your doorbell.
Do you want us to send your package to a parcel station?
Then please choose DHL, because only DHL is allowed to deliver to DHL pack stations.
We will send you an email with the tracking number if you have selected DHL or DPD as the sender.
Therefore, you can already check from around 10 p.m. where your package is.
Your satisfaction is our goal - all five stars count!
If you are satisfied with us, we would be happy if you rate us positively and give us five stars in the detailed ratings.
Should it happen that not everything went to your complete satisfaction, we would be grateful if you would contact us before leaving a rating.
Only this way do we have the chance to do everything to make you happy.
We had nothing to do with the chair.
all of a sudden, the split was there
I just sat down
Here, the lower part, i.e. the part with storage space, was damaged.
Will everything be collected again or just the storage space part?
I'm fed up with Sky Sports F1
Hello fellow F1 fans, over the course of the season, the quality on German Sky has decreased more and more, so I want to vent a little with this post.
First of all, today during the middle of the F2 race, the broadcast was interrupted to start the F1 pre-race coverage on time.
Although the delayed start and the start accident put the schedule far behind the plan, it would still have been possible to show the last (planned) ten minutes as well as the championship decision (!).
Apparently, however, it is the case that, for legal reasons, F1 has priority and everything else has to be restricted as a result, so Sky DE had no choice here.
Nevertheless, it's stupid, since Sky UK has broadcast the race to the end.
Nonetheless, a little praise: the commentator Olivier Zwartyes has accompanied the difficult situation surrounding the serious accident well.
Then, in Formula 1, the commentators Sascha Roos and Ralf Schumacher once again showed their lack of knowledge of the rules, as both of them did not know that you can change tyres under a red flag.
Although this situation already occurred in Imola, Baku and Silverstone this year, both only came to the conclusion that Verstappen could change his tyres when there were corresponding radio messages to Hamilton on this subject.
At Sky UK and RTL, both commentators knew straight away that it was an option for Verstappen.
I think such elementary rules should simply be known if you comment on the F1 at a pay-TV channel.
It's also not the first time that now, according to the rules, it's possible or required to guess, both have simply constant uncertainties in the subject of rules.
In general, he does not like the affected comment style of Roos, but admits that it is a matter of taste.
But I think Heiko Wasser from RTL is even better.
Added to this are the constant jokes that make both of them look simply unprofessional, such as ordering coffee from the (equally clueless) reporter Peter Hardenacke or "UuuuuHD" from Ralf Schumacher.
In particular, the latter causes a lot of unrest in the comment, which he apparently does not take seriously.
Not least of all, the advertising is just getting out of hand at Sky, in the run-off round, Sky is the only broadcaster to go into the advertising, as can be heard on F1TV, where only the German sound track without comment must do directly after the race.
Neither ServusTV nor ORF do this.
These two channels also make less adverts in training than Sky, and as free-to-air channels.
While I must praise Glock and Baumgartner for their work, this alone does not allow me to overlook the disadvantages.
The rest of the Sky Sports F1 schedule is also very poor and full of repeats.
Overall, Sky is really the worst German-speaking broadcaster that broadcasts F1.
Unironically, RTL does a better job with the four races they are still allowed to broadcast.
So, the magnificent F1 season is making a lot less fun than it could be with a reasonable broadcaster.
I would like to hear your opinion.
This one: #PRS_ORG# pendant lamp, brass and multi-coloured glass x 1
Hi, I have an article that was supposed to be delivered last week and it still hasn't been delivered.
I have contacted the chat twice and so far nothing.
The First Lady told me it was going out on Monday, the second lady told me yesterday she was going to check and send it and she never responded.
Hi, I ordered two #PRS_ORG# on 12.12.19.
One of them has already shown a defect after a relatively short time (the fabric has a hole in the front part of the chair).
I ask for your support.
Fan pumps are ideal for providing additional oxygen to an aquarium.
It is also possible to operate a filter system using air lifters.
This series is offered by us in 3 variants.
Check the table at the end of the offer.
There, you can see the services compared.
If the pumps are strong enough, you can operate entire plants with them.
If you have a large aquarium, pumps with 2 or more outlets are suitable, so that you can connect multiple outlets.
The MK series has one, two or four outlets, depending on the model, but a fan pump is also suitable to create an accent in the aquarium, e.g. with an air curtain (available in our shop) or with a decoration, which turns the air bubbles into a function.
Here we would name a treasure chest, a shell, or something like that.
The MK series has a special, sound-insulated construction and thus ensures low operating noise.
The installation is very simple.
The fan pump is connected to a drain or similar using a 4/6 mm air hose...and then it can get started.
The fan pump should be the same or higher than the water level and mounted on the outside.
If the fan pump is lower than the water level, you should install a check valve between them.
Simply cut the air hose and put the valve in between.
This would prevent water from flowing back through the pump and into the pool...
If the fan pump is to be installed outdoors, it should, like other air pumps, be covered and protected from moisture.
The pumps in the MK series are pure powerhouses that consume little energy
Although we state a processing time of 3 days here on eBay, we pack daily, and the parcels are also collected daily here.
If everything goes well on the way, it goes very fast.
We just want to prevent a little bit, so that nobody is upset, just because it took a little longer once.
It would be so, not everyone has understanding for all the employees who also work in the shipping industry...of course, no Corona stops here.
Please do not give a bad rating just because the delivery is delayed, this is exclusively due to the parcel services.
Of course, people like to complain about these services, even though we're saying right now... they've got it damn hard
This is also very different from region to region.
Don't be bad to anyone, stay healthy and we all hope that there will be better times again.
How long does it take to order the yellow one with and without armrests?
Can you also order the legs in white here?
Amazon founder Bezos sends astronaut daughter and TV presenter into space
The daughter of the first American in space, a TV presenter and four other passengers have taken a short trip into space.
They were transported on Saturday by the "New Shepard" rocket system from the company Blue Origin founded by Amazon founder Jeff Bezos.
The start and landing of the approximately ten-minute flight took place in the west of the US state of Texas.
Under a bright blue sky, Bezos himself welcomed the freshly-minted astronauts upon their return.
"Welcome back," said Bezos, dressed in a blue spacesuit, as he opened the hatch to the capsule.
Under the applause of friends, family members and Blue Origin employees, the six passengers climbed out one by one and embraced the Amazon founder.
According to Blue Origin, they were in the air for 10 minutes and 13 seconds and reached an altitude of 107 kilometers.
The 74-year-old Laura Shepard Churchley, daughter of the 1961 NASA astronaut Alan Shepard (1923-1998), after whom the Blue Origin rocket system is named, and the 50-year-old TV presenter Michael Strahan were guests of honour at the company, the other four passengers had paid for their tickets: space engineer Dylan Taylor, investor Evan Dick, technology entrepreneur Lane Bess and his son Cameron.
Blue Origin did not share how much they each paid for their tickets.
After the brief flight, Laura Shepard Churchley remembered her father's mission.
He had to work hard and do everything himself.
She simply came along for the ride, said the 74-year-old with a laugh.
Michael Strahan also spoke enthusiastically.
He would like to return to space as soon as possible, said the moderator.
"New Shepard" flies up to 100 kilometres high
The "New Shepard" rocket system flies largely autonomously.
The capsule separated from the rocket during the flight and reached an altitude of about 100 kilometers above Earth, experiencing weightlessness at times, before the reusable object was slowed by large parachutes and landed.
The International Air Transport Association and many other experts see 100 kilometers above the Earth as the boundary to space, but there is no binding international regulation.
It was already the third manned all-day excursion of Blue Origin: In the first in July, Amazon founder Bezos himself was on board, together with his brother Mark, an 82-year-old former US pilot and an 18-year-old Dutchman.
At the second in October, the 90-year-old Canadian actor William Shatner was on board, who became world famous with his role as "Captain Kirk" in "Star Trek", as well as the former Nasa engineer Chris Boshuizen, the entrepreneur Glen de Vries and the deputy head of Blue Origin, Audrey Powers.
Critics have accused Bezos and Blue Origin of pushing ahead with the business of space tourism largely without scientific research interests for the benefit of humanity, and without regard for the climate.
With a button press, you can easily choose whether your "Smart Stone" should shine in a permanent colour or play through its entire colour spectrum.
When set to change colour, the light stone will hold a light colour for around a minute, before gently changing to the next decorative colour.
The solid construction of the "Smart Stone" light makes it suitable for outdoor use all year round.
In snowy surroundings, her light is even particularly good - only with a shorter light duration is to be expected as soon as the days get shorter.
In winter, please make sure that no snow impairs the function of the solar module.
The "Smart Stone" uses a NiMh battery in the common mignon (AA) format, which can be easily replaced if necessary.
You can get a suitable replacement battery from our web shop and thus extend the service life of your decorative light even further.
A high-gloss effect spray that makes smooth surfaces look like chrome.
Suitable for all smooth surfaces, especially for the design of rims, wheel trims, paint-able plastic parts with appropriate pre-treatment.
With this product, DUPLI-COLOR is offering a wipe- and weather-resistant chrome spray for the first time.
The optimal effect is achieved on a black background, e.g. by priming with DUPLI-COLOR TUNING Effect Primer.
Available as a single dose and in a set including effect primer and dusting cloth for optimal preparation of the paintwork.
For use on metal, wood, glass, paintable hard plastics and stone.
That is perfect. Do I need to add anything else?
They only need the tracking number from my mail?
Someone who works in biochemistry or has studied biochemistry
I'm currently in my first year studying biochemistry and I actually find the subject itself pretty interesting and the lab work doesn't bother me either (I've already completed the inorganic chemistry practical).
Of course, I also looked into career prospects before starting my studies. At the time, I also thought that I would definitely want to study until my doctorate.
However, at the moment I have doubts, especially about my career prospects.
On the one hand (Studycheck, etc.) one always hears about great career opportunities and that the profession is very much in demand, but on the other hand one always hears about unemployed biologists and incredibly badly paid jobs.
Therefore, I would really like to know:
1) What are you working on at the moment?
2) Are you satisfied with your work/salary?
3) What did you study/what training did you do?
4) Would you do it all again?
Thanks for your replies!
I'm really unsure at the moment and am considering possibly dropping out of my studies in 2022 and doing an apprenticeship as an IT specialist.
If you have any experience with this, feel free to share them as well :)
Extra stress before holidays and bank holiday weekends
It came up for me last week.
But now I had to use my long weekend to relax from it.
That is why only now a post is being added.
Not only before big holidays like the Christmas holidays, there is a lot of stress in our company.
It seems that it is also available during holidays plus bridge days.
It was like this: Last week was the Assumption of Mary, which is called "Auffahrt" in Switzerland.
On Friday, the vast majority of people and businesses will take a bridge day, which is therefore semi-official.
It was therefore a long 4-day weekend last week.
So what happened last week?
Stress everywhere.
A lot of e-mails that absolutely had to go out before the bank holiday, order here, order there, all of it *absolutely* before the long weekend.
Because... yes, because?
Because "next week then" sounds like it's been a long time and that can't be?
Or because people really want to do as much in a shortened week as in a normal one?
Not only was I stressed on Wednesday, but I was also very angry.
What is this self-flagellation because of holidays?
Why do we have holidays if we are not allowed to enjoy them properly?!
The stress was not coming from above, the colleagues were all very independent.
My question is simple: are we the only ones, the Swiss?
Is this our reformed-evangelical way?
Or do you know this in the north as well?
Yvonne Catterfeld is looking forward to Christmas in Thuringia
Yvonne Catterfeld (42) is looking forward to Christmas in her Thuringian homeland - but she doesn't even have any gifts yet.
"The beautiful thing is, even if there is no snow in Erfurt, you can just drive to Ilmenau in the Thuringian Forest", said the actress and singer for Hit Radio FFH.
She will get into the festive spirit by baking biscuits and making things with her son.
"I love it," Catterfeld said.
Up until the contemplative days, however, she still has a lot to do: "For the first time, I don't have any presents, I have to get started now".
NEKTON-Bio supports the smooth running of the moult and the formation of new plumage.
NEKTON-Bio contains all the necessary vitamins, amino acids, minerals, trace elements and 200,000 µg biotin/kg.
NEKTON-Bio gives the bird a smooth and shiny plumage.
The majority of feather damage that occurs in bird keeping is solely due to dietary errors.
Since the plumage consists of a protein-rich substance, a particularly rich and balanced protein diet of the bird is a prerequisite for the formation of a flawless feather coat.
For a functioning metabolism, the daily diet must contain sufficient vitamins, minerals and trace elements.
Much of the animal losses that occur during the molt are due to inadequate or imbalanced protein intake and/or inadequate supply of vitamins and minerals.
In the composition of NEKTON-Bio, the unfavourable ratio of amino acids in most plant-based feeds is explicitly taken into account and balanced.
During the application of NEKTON-Bio, no other vitamin preparation should be given.
NEKTON-Bio is cold water soluble and can be administered simply via the drinking water or via soft food.
Thanks, I found it
Unfortunately, it still doesn't work.
DDR handicraft model old building E-Lok E 95 03 DRG/DR, the locomotive was used in Silesia and central Germany, the very rare locomotive probably comes from the conversion proposal of the model railway enthusiast ME issue 11/1968, used with play marks and missing parts see photos, function good, The E 95 series is a heavy freight train electric locomotive of the Deutsche Reichsbahn-Gesellschaft (DRG), which was designed for the traction of heavy coal trains in the Silesian network, it is possible that the kit also comes from the small-series company ZSCHUTSCHKE and BACHMANN.
A locomotive is located in the DB Museum in Halle (Saale) and is operational
In 1924 the Deutsche Reichsbahn-Gesellschaft commissioned AEG to submit proposals for an electric locomotive capable of hauling 2,200-tonne coal trains and 530-tonne passenger trains at 45 km/h.
A maximum speed of 65 km/h was required.
Thus, in March 1926, the DRG decided on the delivery as a 1'Co+Co1' locomotive with Tatzlager drive from AEG with the delivery of the mechanical part, and the Siemens-Schuckertwerke with the electrical part.
Between December 1927 and June 1928, six locomotives were delivered, which received the operating numbers E 95 01–06.
They all survived the Second World War and found themselves, afterwards, on the territory of the future GDR.
In 1946, the locomotives arrived in the Soviet Union as reparation goods.
They returned to Germany until November 1952.
In the Reichsbahn repair shop in Dessau, it was determined that all six locomotives are suitable for restoration.
[4] As the re-electrification of the Central German network progressed, there was an increasing need for locomotives for heavy freight train service. In 1959, the three locomotives E 95 01 to E 95 03 were converted, with the other machines being used as a source of spare parts.
First of all, the E 04, E 44 and E 94, which were available in greater numbers, were preferred.
Only when it became clear that the E 94 would not be able to increase the processing number any further, did the E 95 come into focus for processing.
[4] Initially, the locomotives were stationed at the Leipzig-Wahren railway depot.
They came to the Halle P depot in 1960.
They were mostly used in a separate timetable in front of coal trains from Geiseltal in the direction of Halle, Leipzig and Erfurt.
As they got older, the complicated controls on the locomotives proved problematic.
It happened often that shooters got stuck during switching actions.
Then the co-driver, who was constantly travelling on this locomotive, had to use a hammer and a wooden wedge to loosen the guard during the journey.
Damage to the drive motors was frequent, leading to months of downtime for the locomotive.
[5] As enough new locomotives were available at the end of the 1960s, and a significant expansion of the electric operation was not planned at that time, the Reichsbahn was able to do without old locomotives and most of the splinter groups, so the E 95 was taken out of service.
In addition, the German Reichsbahn only wanted to man electric locomotives with one person, which would have resulted in a problem in train operations due to the difficulties with the machines and the visibility from the driver's cab.
[5] After mid-1969, the E 95 02 and E 95 03 were retired, followed by the E 95 01 as the last on 5 October 1970.
The planned new designation 255 001 was thus never used.
All locomotives, with the exception of E 95 02, were dismantled.
The E 95 02 was set up as a replacement for the future museum locomotive E 77 10 as a point heating system at the main station in Halle.
It took some time for the officials at the Reichsbahn to be convinced that the E 95 was worth preserving as a museum locomotive.
In 1979, the initial external restoration of the locomotive began, with the goal of being able to present it at a vehicle show in the Dessau RAW.
[5] Since then, it has been part of the Dresden Transport Museum as a non-operational museum locomotive.
In 1986, the internal completion of the locomotive took place.
The locomotive is cared for in a museum at the DB Museum in Halle (Saale).
Since 1995, employees of the Traditionsgemeinschaft Bw Halle P have been working on the operational restoration of the locomotive.
In April 2015, the locomotive could be presented for the first time at an exhibition in the Museum Bw Arnstadt with new internal and external paint, where the transformers were checked and five drive motors were operational.
The locomotives were used on the Silesian Mountain Railway and the branch lines until 1945, where they proved themselves due to their reliable drive and low maintenance requirements.
In February 1945, the machines were transferred to Leipzig for the central German network.
Its main area of operation was initially Silesia.
H0 handicraft model in OVP, function good, it is necessary to carry out optical repairs on the locomotive in one's own work, dusty, with play marks, cellar smell !!!, very rare handicraft model, very small run - possibly the kit also comes from the small series company ZSCHUTSCHKE and BACHMANN
The containers may have labels and storage markings.
Yes the F-parts are it
I received a bed from you.
However, there were problems with one part.
The middle bar is held by two feet. Unfortunately, these are too narrow and the bar cannot be mounted on the feet.
What do we do now?
I can't build the bed.
The middle beam is held up by two feet, which are unfortunately produced incorrectly.
The middle bar does not fit into the intended holder.
So I get new ones sent to me.
When will they be sent on their way?
No, no flats.
These are, according to the assembly instructions, the correct ones in shape, they were just too narrow
But that does not matter.
As long as they do their job
They're not flat for me
Could I get these sent to me?
Hello #NAME#, shall I explain the problem to you again?
Residential building fire with two minor injuries and high damage
Two people have been slightly injured in a fire in a residential building in Upper Bavaria.
In addition, an estimated damage in the six-figure euro range was incurred, as the police announced on Sunday.
The fire had probably spread from a carport to the adjacent home in Kinsau (Landsberg am Lech district).
According to reports, two residents were taken to the hospital on Sunday with minor smoke inhalation.
The exact cause of the fire was initially unknown, but the police did not suspect arson.
The Fürstenfeldbruck Criminal Investigation Department has taken over further investigations.
It will then arrive much later
And I have to pay shipping costs again
To debunk fake news - Biontech CEO publishes vaccination photo
Uğur Şahin posted a photo of his first vaccination in early 2021 on the social network "LinkedIn"
Biontech CEO Uğur Şahin has not yet spoken publicly about his vaccination status.
Now the entrepreneur has published a photo showing his corona vaccination.
The illness of a friend had moved him, said Şahin.
The CEO and co-founder of the Mainz-based company Biontech, Uğur Şahin, has published a photo showing him receiving a vaccination against the coronavirus.
There was false information on social media that I was allegedly not vaccinated.
In fact, my wife and I have received three doses of the Biontech-Pfizer vaccine," wrote Şahin on Friday in a post on the "LinkedIn" network.
"For months now, my friends have been urging me to post a picture of me getting the vaccine to combat these false rumors."
Until now, he has refused to do so, because communication should not revolve around him.
But a call last week changed his mind: "I was deeply saddened when I learned that an old school friend of mine is currently fighting for his life.
He is battling a severe Covid-19 infection and has been on a ventilator for three weeks.
The school friend and his family were not vaccinated, Şahin continued.
He did not ask about the reasons.
"The most common cause, however, seems to be fear, which is often stoked by misinformation and mistrust."
Fear is difficult to combat with facts, sometimes it's better to share personal experiences.
An interview with Deutsche Welle is circulating on the internet, in which Uğur Şahin says he is not vaccinated.
However, the video was made in December 2020, as Deutsche Welle itself clarified.
"It is currently not legally possible for me to get the vaccine myself," Şahin said at the time.
There is a prioritisation in Germany when it comes to the administration of the vaccine.
In the meantime, the prioritisation has long been lifted - and according to his own statements, the Biontech boss has been vaccinated three times.
Fire in substation: tens of thousands of people without electricity
In several municipalities in North Rhine-Westphalia, the lights went out on Friday evening: no more electricity and in many cases, probably also no heating.
A fire had disabled a switching station.
After a fire with severe damage to a substation, tens of thousands of people in the Rhein-Sieg district in North Rhine-Westphalia had to do without electricity for around 24 hours.
On Friday evening, the lights went out for 41,000 affected residents and residents in several municipalities due to the fire.
The supply company Westnetz reported that on Saturday, numerous emergency power generators were in operation until the large-scale outage was finally completely resolved in the late evening.
Firefighters and helpers from the THW provided assistance in the municipalities.
Authorities offered care places in schools and called for neighbourhood help.
The supplier thanked those affected for their patience and the helpers for their efforts.
We are very aware that the last 24 hours have caused significant disruption.
We would also like to thank the affected municipalities, the district, the fire brigades and the THW for their tireless efforts," said the head of the primary technology area, Florian Witt, in a statement on Saturday evening.
It will take a few more days to repair the damage, as the Westnetz installers were only able to temporarily put some of the lines back into operation, he explained.
According to the company, a technical defect led to the fire.
Electricity is flowing again
According to Westnetz, the fire that broke out on Friday at around 7.15 p.m. severely damaged parts of the 10,000-volt switchgear at the Neunkirchen-Seelscheid substation.
There, extensive cleaning and repair work is necessary.
At the same time, a connection to a 30,000-volt voltage level was created.
With the help of this bypass, the electricity supply is restored.
Since 6 p.m. on Saturday, more than 21,000 people in Much and Ruppichteroth have had electricity again.
Another 20,000 inhabitants of Neunkirchen-Seelscheid were gradually connected from 9.30 p.m.
Since 11:15 p.m., those affected by the last outage have also had electricity.
Over 80 fitters from Westnetz and partner companies were at work.
The authorities had also called for help from neighbours after setting up an emergency power supply for important buildings on Saturday afternoon.
"Now, it is important that citizens take care of older or single people in their neighbourhood and inform the local fire station if help is needed," explained Landrat Sebastian Schuster (CDU) after a crisis meeting.
When setting up and operating emergency power generators, the focus was mainly on the residents of nursing homes.
In addition, according to the authorities, care places were temporarily set up in schools for those people who could not take care of themselves or who need electricity-dependent medical devices or medical care.
Guten Tag!
Unfortunately, the ceiling is sold out in Germany.
Can I buy them from you and pay in Euros?
It's the #PRS_ORG# day blanket in blue-green.
I hope you also have a nice day and please stay healthy ♡
However, I cannot mount the undercarriage on the table top.
This is Custom #NAME#.
There are three versions of it.
We wanted those with table tops of #NUMBER#
We have a diameter of 155cm.
Today my #PRS_ORG# arrived, but I can't push them together to shorten them.
Can you help me with that?
Otherwise I would have to send it back as it is not suitable for the purpose.
I would appreciate feedback
Yes, that's really easier!
Then we'll do it this way!
Can you email me the return label?
The repair is now complete.
I had already tried this before the chat.
However, before the purchase, I had not restarted the E-#PRS_ORG#.
Should I do it now?
I find such a low reimbursement almost impertinent.
We disagree
Nordic Combined: Riiber wins Nordic Combined
The German Nordic combined skiers Fabian Rießle and Julian Schmid sprinted onto the podium at the World Cup in Otepää, Estonia.
Again, the duo had to give in to the outstanding Norwegian Jarl Magnus Riiber, who had already started with a large lead after the ski jump.
Return for order number #NUMBER#
When will the money be returned to my account?
Yes, we both have a new one and use version 4.5...
Perhaps they have heard about problems before.
I just bought a book with my #PRS_ORG#, it seems to be on it.
When I try to open it, I get the message, oops!
This document could not be opened.
If the file is corrupted, contact customer service.
As far as I can tell, it's a #PRS_ORG# epub file.
Can they help me?
Chat connection is gone and now what?
I also have to work in between!
To ensure that the paint application is even and clean, you should clean the parts with a little soap and water to remove dust, grease and fingerprints, rinse with clear water and dry.
Before you put the brush on the model for the first time with a new color, it is advisable to practice 2 to 3 strokes.
You can do this on the later invisible inside of the building parts or on a yoghurt cup.
The first mark on the part
Draw the brush evenly stroke by stroke.
A slight overlap of the colour layers ensures a uniform surface later on.
Avoid quick back-and-forth strokes with the brush.
This results in unrealistically large areas.
A model is not a garden fence.
Start with the bright colors.
The dark ones could otherwise shine through later.
Metallic tones and metallic colors come at the very end with a separate brush.
Otherwise, ugly metal streaks can occur if they are mixed with normal paints.
Let the painted parts dry for a day before you install them.
The models achieve their original appearance through the decals or stickers.
From emblems on aircraft to ship names to decorative strips and number plates on car models: The decals give the model that final touch.
Apply the decals in the correct order while the parts are still easy to reach.
It is easier to cover an aircraft cockpit before it is installed in the fuselage.
Time, patience and a steady hand are even more important than the right tools like scissors, tweezers and toothpicks.
Cut out each decal you need individually and arrange them.
Decals are also called waterslide decals, because you wet the back of them briefly with water, until the backing paper turns dark with the moisture.
Then you just slide the picture a little bit off the paper and put the piece on the corresponding place on the model (which you have also moistened before).
While you hold the decal in place on the model with a tool, pull the backing paper off to the side.
Caution: Always check to see if the image is in the right place before you slide it completely off the paper, so that it doesn't stick to your finger, wrinkle, or even tear.
Suck up excess water with a household cloth.
Not suitable for children under 3 years
I can only open a book for a short time, once I look for something else then I can't read the book anymore and I have to log out and log in and load the book again and find the place where I was reading.
I have already communicated with you on Saturday.
Do I get this via email?
Even for all 3 packages?
Because the lamp came to me in 3 separate packages
OK, thank you anyway!
Then I'll buy elsewhere when the money is back.
But will I get it back without any problems?
Fertility treatment with private health insurance: What is an "insurance case"?
Hello everyone,
We were in fertility treatment for some time, now that it comes to billing the private health insurance, it is suddenly standing in our way.
One after the other:
We had applied for fertility treatment in advance with the PKV, and received approval for three attempts.
The experiments were in no way (e.g. time frame, success, etc.) restricted.
The first attempt led directly to a successful pregnancy and birth, and was covered by private health insurance.
Some time later, we tried to have a second child, and we went through 2 (unsuccessful) attempts, but we have not yet claimed this from the private health insurance.
We applied again for reimbursement by the private health insurance and we were again granted three more attempts.
After a few more attempts (we carried out more attempts than promised, of course the most expensive ones are reimbursed by the private health insurance), we submitted the bills to the private health insurance and received the bad surprise: instead of 5 attempts (2+3), the private health insurance will only reimburse 3 attempts.
The reason: With the pregnancy/birth, the remaining 2 attempts of the first promise expire.
The second wish for a child is a new insurance case.
According to the terms and conditions, however, "The insurance event begins with the start of treatment and ends when the need for treatment no longer exists."
The questions to the experts in the round here:
* Who is right here, the private health insurance (only 3 attempts are reimbursed) or us (5 attempts must be reimbursed)?
* Would the private health insurance have had to point out to us in the promises that with a birth, the further attempts would lapse?
* Is the desire for a second child really a new insurance event?
Infertility (caused by blocked fallopian tubes) is not cured by the first child.
It would be great if the experts could give their opinion here.
Thank you in advance for your help!
Can you please email me the three options and tell me the best way to reach them?
Okay.
We will never order from them again.
If they add up my sales and those of my friend #NAME# (same address), they have obviously lost a good customer.
They are welcome to pass this on to their manager.
That's not competitive.
Yesterday, my colleague told me that the repayment was triggered, and now you are telling me that I have to send the thing back first.
I can't do anything about the fact that the chest of drawers arrives at my place completely damaged
Please see what the colleague has written in the screenshot
It states clearly that the refund was requested and I still haven't received a refund from #PRS_ORG#
They can tell their manager that they have now lost two regular customers.
My friend has also ordered various pieces of furniture for our apartment using his account.
We won't do that anymore.
No, the defect only appeared after a few months.
An office chair must withstand normal use.
Otherwise, they are not allowed to sell it as an office chair.
Regardless, the 24-month guarantee applies.
No, I'm not able to get a different type of packaging.
I will take the wardrobe apart and make it available to the transport company.
Good day, I have a question about your series of #PRS_ORG#
These products are advertised with additional footstools, which unfortunately we cannot find at your store.
Can they help?
Theme of the week: The best low budget films
There is no general definition of what a low-budget film is with exact budget limits.
The Wikipedia has this to say about it:
A **low-budget film** or **low-budget movie** is a motion picture shot with little to no funding from a major film studio or private investor.
On the web you can find plenty of lists of low-budget films, such as on Letterboxd.com.
Do you know interesting representatives of this category?
What do you find appealing about it?
And what do you not like at all?
I am a very good customer of yours, I have already furnished two apartments completely with your furniture.
She wanted to get the best price for the grey leather sofa Odelle.
Now that the delivery time has been extended again, is it now reliable?
Thank you very much
Sincerely,
If there is no telephone number, a chat where you have to wait 30 minutes is not a chat!
Unfortunately, nothing changes in the waiting position...I'll give up again soon, because it just doesn't work here.
Hello
"Half a victory" against Belarus with high costs for the EU
According to the political expert Raphael Bossong, the EU can announce a "half victory" in the conflict with the Belarusian regime.
However, the costs are very high and mean massive violations of the rights of migrants and refugees at Belarus' border with Poland and Lithuania, said Bossong to the Evangelical Press Service (epd).
The EU has not solved the confrontation in a sustainable way, the researcher from the Berlin Foundation for Science and Politics (SWP) explained.
This state of limbo - Belarus is not quite giving up, but the EU feels like a winner - will probably continue for some time.
The way in which people at the border are treated is not in line with the European Convention on Human Rights, ruled Bossong.
Apparently, there is an "increasing normalisation of pushbacks" by individual EU governments.
Since the EU as a whole has not decided to stand up against it, it will be at the expense of fundamental rights.
This development is at the same time weakening the unity in the Union.
"She is apparently unable to assert herself when a member state decides to do its own thing," as is currently the case with Poland, which does not even allow the EU border protection agency Frontex access to the border.
In addition, the EU is paying another price for its policy at the border with Belarus, according to Bossong: A basic agreement on asylum policy is being made more difficult because the line "border protection, border protection, border protection" has been strengthened.
Another attempt to cross the border
According to Poland's border guards, meanwhile, migrants have again tried to enter Polish territory from Belarus.
Fifty-five migrants were arrested in the night to Sunday and taken back to the border, a spokeswoman for the authority said on Sunday.
The Polish officials were attacked by the migrants with stones near the village of Czeremsza.
A soldier was reportedly struck in the face and had to be medically treated by a military doctor.
In total, the border guards registered 52 attempted border crossings within 24 hours.
On Friday evening, a group of 28 migrants had already crossed the border barriers.
Thousands of people from countries like Iraq and Afghanistan had crossed or tried to cross the border between Belarus and the EU in recent months.
The EU accuses Alexander Lukashenko, the ruler in Minsk, of luring them with the prospect of travel to the EU.
Poland and Lithuania have reportedly closed parts of their borders.
The EU has sanctioned Belarus and threatened airlines that fly migrants and refugees into the country.
In addition, EU Commissioners are travelling to the countries of origin of the people in order to prevent them from leaving there.
The most effective element of the EU's response has been the pressure on the airlines, said Bossong.
"There, the EU has thrown its market power into the balance and demonstrated its determination to operate with a heavy hand and extraterritorial sanctions".
Minsk must also take into account internal political costs.
The Belarusian society is probably not used to the fact that the security apparatus regularly funnels thousands of people through the country.
Mercedes protests after controversial F1 finale
According to Mercedes, Max Verstappen is said to have committed two rule violations during the race.
Abu Dhabi - After the controversial Formula 1 finale in Abu Dhabi, Mercedes has lodged an appeal.
The Silver Arrows suspect two rule violations in the last Grand Prix of the year.
A protest relates to an alleged infraction by Max Verstappen in the Red Bull in the last Safety Car phase, when he was said to have overtaken illegally.
A second protest was lodged against the result at the end of the race.
According to Mercedes, the protocol was not followed in accordance with the rules.
Verstappen had overtaken Lewis Hamilton in the Mercedes on the last lap and raced to his first Formula 1 title.
The manoeuvre took place shortly after the end of a safety car phase, during which the Dutchman had overtaken the car in front of him.
I'll check on that.
I will speak to the bank and get back to you
Thanks for the support
Free admission for members: Europa-Park holds SC Freiburg fan day
Europa-Park, named after the Europa-Park Stadium of the SC Freiburg, has invited to the SC Freiburg Fan Day.
As the park reports, members and season ticket holders of the sports club from the Breisgau as well as members of the fan community were allowed to visit the Europa-Park free of charge on this day.
In addition, there were vouchers for drinks and sausages.
The roller coaster cars glowed red and white on this day.
Füchsle, Ed Euromaus and many red-and-white balloons provided the perfect backdrop," the park said.
The cooperation between the Bundesliga club and the leisure park in Rust, 40 kilometres north of Freiburg, has existed since the beginning of the 1990s.
The first SC Freiburg Fantag in the Europa-Park has again shown how well the partnership fits.
Seeing beaming fans having fun together in the roller coaster confirms this," says Europa-Park owner Jürgen Mack.
Why is it €#NUMBER# and not the original 1699€?
Stages in the career of the new world champion Verstappen
The Dutchman Max Verstappen is the new Formula 1 world champion.
Max Verstappen has done it.
The Dutchman takes his first world championship in his seventh year in Formula 1 at Red Bull.
His path to the top of the elite class:
Abu Dhabi - 2012, Italy: Verstappen loses the kart world championship after a crash in Sarno.
Father Jos Verstappen lets him stop at a petrol station on the way back.
His mother, Sophie Kumpen, collects the teenager in the following car.
2014, England: Red Bull's junior team gets a promising new recruit in Verstappen.
The 16-year-old is following in the footsteps of Sebastian Vettel and Daniel Ricciardo.
He will continue to compete in European Formula 3 for the time being.
2015, Australia: Verstappen starts at the age of 17 years and 166 days as the youngest driver in history in a Grand Prix.
Due to a defect, he had to stop his Toro Rosso prematurely in Melbourne.
2015, Malaysia: The then Toro Rosso driver Verstappen is also the youngest driver to score points in Formula 1 at the age of 17 years and 180 days.
Verstappen takes seventh place at the Malaysian Grand Prix in Sepang.
2016, Spain: Verstappen wins his first race for Red Bull.
At 18 years and 228 days, he will sensationally become the youngest Grand Prix winner in Formula 1 history in Barcelona.
2019, Hungary: Verstappen celebrates his Pole-Premiere in Budapest - he is not the youngest.
At 21, he leaves behind Valtteri Bottas and his Mercedes teammate Lewis Hamilton.
2021, Abu Dhabi: The summit has been reached.
Verstappen celebrates his first world championship at the age of 24 at the Formula 1 finale in Abu Dhabi - with an overtaking manoeuvre against Hamilton in the final round. dpa
I had a huge issue with you back then when I ordered the #PRS_ORG# chest of drawers.
Judith Hermann read from her novel "Daheim"
As part of the reading series "LiteraTour Nord", author Judith Hermann read from her current novel "Daheim" on Friday in the sold-out Blue Note and also acted as moderator.
She is divorced, lives in a house on the coast and listens sensitively to the nocturnal sounds at her front door.
I submitted a contact form to return an item yesterday but have not received an email confirmation or anything similar.
My question is whether my inquiry has been received.
Not everyone has the time for your stupid chat and cheap Chinese junk.
It's your mistake that you fix and not all of us from our household.
Contact Mrs. #NAME#.
I can't chat with them every day
We chatted yesterday and agreed that I or Mrs. #NAME# would get an email with a 60 Euro voucher, a new order of the #PRS_ORG# bedside table, and a return shipping label.
This email has not yet been received.
They want to deliver the package to #PRS_ORG# today.
Please contact me
Best regards
The LokSound 5 decoder can play up to 10 channels simultaneously.
Each channel can be sampled at up to 16 bit / 31250 kHz and finally offers HiFi quality on your system.
It is practically indistinguishable from the original.
A Class-D audio power amplifier with up to 3W output power drives the speakers, which must have an impedance between 4 Ohm and 32 Ohm.
The huge 128 MB sound memory provides enough capacity.
All individual noises can be individually adjusted in volume.
The super-flexible sound engine without a rigid schedule allows for the exemplary simulation of all conceivable rail vehicles.
Three independently adjustable braking functions and two alternative load scenarios give you maximum control over your vehicles.
Sorry, but just because he says he's not an anti-Semite doesn't mean anything.
That's like when an AfD member says he has nothing against foreigners.
They will not both admit their i.
But Kollegah is constantly reproducing any kind of antisemitic messages.
If you want to distance yourself then you should just let it go completely.
Yes, wow, then you're just as little to be taken seriously as Kollegah.
Anyone who seriously questions evolution is just plain lost.
According to me, a god started it all.
But once you're a creationist, you have to believe that the Earth is 10,000 years old and that scientists are spouting nonsense.
And with that, you are an enemy of science and not to be taken seriously like Kollegah
To get the optimal field of view, the magnifier should be held as close to the eye as possible.
The specially aplanatic-achromatic lens system allows you to use the loupe practically free of distortion and colour error even in the edge zone.
Often, loupes are marked with magnification values.
However, these figures only apply to exactly specified conditions, which are rarely the same as the conditions of use.
To get the best out of your magnifying glass, please note the information in the "Technical Data" table (See user manual in the packaging).
Light reflections occur on the lens surfaces of all optical devices, including magnifying glasses.
With an anti-reflective coating, these reflections are significantly reduced.
If the optimal conditions of use - the magnifying glass close to the eye - are observed, reflections on the lens surfaces are less noticeable.
Further information can be found in the attached user manual (available in German and English).
Zeiss VisuCard Magnifier ID Card Magnifier Magnification Pocket Magnifier Reading Magnifier Reading Aid
Whether as a reading aid for on the go or simply for everyday trivialities: the Zeiss VisuCard is the ideal helper as it can be taken anywhere thanks to its handy format.
And their hard shell makes them robust against special stresses in everyday life.
Each loupe comes with a credit-card-size case for storage and safe transport.
They are bidding on these parts, which you can see in the pictures or which are described under "What are you bidding on".
What condition is the offered item in?
Of course, everyone can overlook something once in a while, because no one is free of errors - should this be the case, just send a message and it will be resolved to your complete satisfaction (either by exchange, partial refund or complete refund).
They get a proper invoice.
Delivery is always made, unless otherwise requested by the buyer, insured with a tracking number via DHL!
Please refer to the shipping conditions above for individual shipping costs.
There are no additional handling fees.
ok say all authorized, how can I check more precisely?
Yes, both the email address
#PRS_ORG# I will do very nice and good service, although it took a while to get to a person, they were super
Hello dear #PRS_ORG# team,
I have already contacted you under customer contact with the number #PHONENUMBER#.
Yes, but it was called before.
They can't deliver from England because of #PRS_ORG#.
Christmas tree sales in Schönwolde: Women in the community of Krembz choose the Christmas trees
Farmer Frank Diers has already experienced many curious situations when selling Christmas trees.
At one point, a man was even driven home without his partner, because the two of them could not agree.
Each year, he plants around 2000 of them.
The 56-year-old has already experienced many curious situations.
That makes the run-up to Christmas a bit more fun, he says.
And what about the coupon?
Otherwise, I'm gone as a customer?!
After all, I received a defective delivery and now have to pay the full price for it.
Then I will rate it accordingly!
We don't need to debate here which is the better court, but there are some similarities between the two.
Both consist of meat that is grilled on a rotating skewer.
And both have therefore their name.
In German, an equivalent might be something like "Dreher", which doesn't sound nearly as tasty.
Problems with fibre + Devolo DLan/Magic
We've had a new fibre-optic connection in the house for a few weeks now.
Unfortunately, I'm now having problems setting up a stable Wi-Fi network.
Before that, I had a 50 Mbit DSL connection and used Devolo DLan, which received and sent 50 Mbit flawlessly, with the exception of a few outages.
The new fibre-optic connection sends 500 Mbit to the FritzBox 7590 and the DLan module, which is connected to the FritzBox, also receives them.
However, at the other DLan module, which sends the Wifi, I do not get the full 500, but the more I move away from the module in the house, the less I get (i.e. I use a socket that is 1, 2, 3, etc. rooms away from the other module).
This means that the Internet with the new fibre optic connection is now even slower in the first floor (\~45 Mbit).
I also ordered a new Devolo Magic Set, which apparently uses a new technology.
This was slightly better than the DLan, but again there were large losses.
Could someone explain to me why so much internet speed is "lost" over the power line with fibre optics?
And is LAN really the only solution?
It would be extremely costly to lay LAN cables in the house.
I am really desperate, which is why I have created an account here.
Therefore, I would be all the more pleased to receive an answer.
When it's time to switch your current account
Anyone who thought that there would now be peace with Giro accounts is mistaken.
While many banks have used the autumn to get their customers to confirm the fee increases of the past with all sorts of tricks, the thresholds for negative interest rates are also falling.
The Deutsche Bank, for example, was long considered relatively generous with a limit of 100,000 euros.
Now, she has just halved the tax-free amount and even quartered it for daily money.
In a first step, the limit was lowered only for customers of the group's Postbank division - to 50,000 euros for current and investment accounts and to 25,000 euros for cash accounts.
However, these lower tax-free allowances now apply to the entire Deutsche Bank, as a spokesman confirmed on request.
And not just for new contracts, but also for "new individual agreements made with existing customers".
The Commerzbank had already gone down to a limit of 50,000 euros, which is still in force, as is the case at ING Deutschland.
The direct bank DKB, which is particularly popular with cost-conscious customers, has lowered the free limits in two steps, first to 50,000 euros, and now to 25,000 euros.
After all, more than 100 banks now have a free limit of 25,000 euros or less, according to figures from the internet portal Verivox.
Sparda-Bank Berlin has also arrived at 25,000 euros: However, there is still a legal dispute with the Consumer Centres, who, in the first instance, even won against this regulation at the Berlin Regional Court.
Now the banks are already discussing whether the institutes should possibly form reserves - in case the higher authorities also declare negative interest rates in principle to be inadmissible and many millions have to be paid back to bank customers.
The table top for 8 people was delivered instead of the one for 6 people.
The trailer is for 6 people.
Jennifer Aniston has an entire beauty army
She is now officially at the top of Hollywood.
But their lives are like a rollercoaster.
Jennifer Aniston (52) was voted the most influential woman of the year by the US magazine "The Hollywood Reporter".
For her, who made a splash in 2021 with the "Friends" reunion and the continuation of her series "The Morning Show," this success is first and foremost the result of a lot of discipline and work.
A whole army of assistants, stylists and trainers take care of her appearance.
After all, according to Aniston, she treats herself to a chip a day (yes, you read that right: a SINGLE chip from the bag).
That their hearts are won over by the female and male fans is actually a miracle.
Maybe she is just unlucky in love - and is still looking for the great love.
And he's crossed off the baby wish from the list.
Prior to that, she was constantly asked when she was going to become a mother.
It hurt her.
The people that ask that have no idea what's going on with me personally, medically, why I can't.
It was really hurtful.
It remains to be hoped that success and glory also bring happiness.
Shameful end to a career: Räikkönen has to give up
Kimi Räikkönen's departure from Formula 1 was even quieter than expected.
Abu Dhabi - The 42-year-old Finn took off his gloves and wiped the sweat from his brow.
That was it.
After a driving error and a slight collision with a barrier, Räikkönen had to stop his Alfa Romeo at the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix after less than half the race distance.
It was his 349th and last Grand Prix, the "Iceman" is ending his career in the motorsport king class.
To say goodbye, his wife Minttu and the two children also travelled to the United Arab Emirates.
Räikkönen's greatest success was winning the World Championship in 2007 with Ferrari.
He won 21 Grand Prix, started from pole 18 times and stood on the podium 103 times. dpa
Friedrich wins 60th World Cup victory - Nolte wins the two-man bobsleigh - Sport
The mark of Norwegian biathlete Ole Einar Björndalen with 94 victories is the goal of the bobsledder.
"I've worked it out, I'd have to win nine-and-a-half races per season, then I'd be able to make it to Cortina 2026," said the double Olympic champion from the BSC Oberbärenburg, who had two successes in two days at the races in Winterberg.
On Saturday, he fended off an attack from Johannes Lochner by five hundredths, moving from third to first place.
Then he changed something in the material settings and drove a bigger lead of 0.30 seconds on Sunday.
With his team Thorsten Margis (SV Halle), Candy Bauer (BSC Oberbärenburg) and Alexander Schüller (SV Halle) he beat the Brit Brad Hall.
The Austrian Benjamin Maier came in third.
"We took a bigger risk today and were rewarded," said Friedrich, who also claimed his 22nd victory in a row.
Berchtesgaden's Johannes Lochner, who was driving for Stuttgart, came in fifth this time after coming in second previously.
Christoph Hafer from BC Bad Feilnbach landed in eighth place after coming fourth in the first race.
"If I knew what he was doing differently, then I would do it that way too," said Lochner.
Nolte with home win - Podium for Jamanka
Laura Nolte won her third season victory in the women's two-man bobsleigh at her home track.
After she only managed fourth place in the Monobob the day before, she raced to victory in the World Cup on Sunday with pusher Deborah Levi.
Two-man bobsleigh Olympic champion Mariama Jamanka from BRC Thuringia came second with Germany's fastest sprinter, Alexandra Burghardt from Burghausen.
In addition to qualifying for the Olympics, she recorded her first podium finish this winter.
Wiesbaden's Kim Kalicki landed in third place with Leonie Fiebig.
For me, it was super cool, first podium place in the World Cup, I am super happy that Mariama is taking me with her.
I am super happy with the development.
There is still a lot of potential at the start, but the start times today were okay," said Burghardt and emphasised: "It's not just pushing, but there's also a lot to do around it".
Jamanka was a little miffed about the not-quite-perfect runs, but said: "It's going in the right direction."
I had the duvet in my basket already and can now buy it!!!
What should I do?
I haven't received it and therefore couldn't redeem it, which is why I finally asked.
Last year I had completely different problems due to Corona and never had time for it.
And now it was said that he had expired, which made me very angry.
Look in the chat, it was about the Asare seat bench.
I want to return it and then re-order as it is on sale right now :)
Why is shipping only starting on 16th March?
There was nothing on your website about such a long delivery time
No, only when I type does an extra field appear with the message
It was taken yesterday by your colleague.
Why is that a problem today?
I've also sent you pictures of the incorrectly delivered goods.
But we still want the unit, just a new, undamaged one.
And not to cancel the entire order.
Only this day, only this week, only until XY...
Hello lovely ladies and girls and women,
I have a lot of things that I just want to write down, and maybe it's the same for one or the other...
I'm 24, I have cPTSD, I'm a full-time student and I'm a dog mum - apart from the fact that my dog doesn't cry or go to kindergarten, he's actually 1 to 1 my child.
My boyfriend (of 6 years) is sick, got a second-degree burn on Monday and has been depressed for years (but is now in therapy).
I visited him yesterday, because I also have emotional needs, and because I want to see and feel him, we cuddled a lot and it was nice.
I helped him in the shower (because his hand is in a bandage due to a burn).
He also has a cold, and we see each other less often these days (1-2x a week), which is very difficult for me with my needs for affection and love.
My puppy has just got a stomach ache, I cooked for him and now he is in his cuddle blanket and has relaxed a bit after I was there with the heat lamp and petting him.
I live with my sister and my mother, and my mother is away for a month.
Now, we also have housework coming our way, of course, which we naturally divide between us.
But even cooking is a lot of work for me...
My PTSD is well controlled at the moment, I'm half-way well-treated and coping.
Not great, but I'm getting by and I'm almost symptom-free.
My university is currently demanding a lot (for me), tomorrow at 3 p.m. I have a written test for which I haven't done anything yet and the day after tomorrow I have an anatomy class for which I should at least prepare a bit.
And next week, I have an oral exam on Tuesday, and what's coming next is in my calendar and not in my head because there's no more space there.
So goes my week: Only until tomorrow, then it's the weekend.
But after that, the whole thing goes on?
Only until his birthday.
Only until the beginning of the holidays.
Only until the weekend.
Only until...
And so it goes on forever.
I think I'm just so stressed that I need those mental cues otherwise I can't do it.
I feel guilty and "chaotic" somehow, but I can't do it any other way...
Do you feel the same way?
Honestly, I'm infinitely grateful that I don't have to work.
I am truly infinitely grateful, I can't put it into words.
I don't know if I would have survived otherwise.
I think this also has something to do with the mental load of women, and that is why I thought that I would find fellow sufferers here...
I wish you all a restful evening, the week is almost over!
I received my order today, unfortunately the whole thing is a different colour plus the surface is scratched and the table leg has a mark on it.
The first delivery was exactly the same colour as on the website.
We are very disappointed!!!!
What can you offer me?
If we change the table now, will I get a different colour, or what?
The email to cancel was sent on 26.12.#NUMBER#.
In fact, twice.
It was not confirmed, however.
Something completely different: I noticed at school that many religion teachers do not believe in God and for them, religion is just another subject like maths or geography.
For me, it's always been a bit strange, perhaps also because I was brought up as a Christian and I always somehow believed.
How do you feel about that?
Maybe you can also talk about work or study colleagues with different attitudes.
In principle, I understand the difference between private and professional life and it makes sense to keep them separate.
There is also a curriculum and so on.
But I would also find it strange to have a physics teacher who does not believe in the theory of relativity.
What makes you want to teach religion if you don't believe in it?
Preserve culture or something like that?
I hope your question isn't too personal.
Can't it be changed or not? Please write in English, I understand it well.
That has been a very long time, so I would advise against it
It's good, thank you.
I expect a response soon, at the latest by the beginning of next week.
Thank you for your support #NAME#.
Film search help please
Hello everybody,
I'm looking for a film from my childhood (I'm 24).
I believe it was a film for young people.
The film has two time axes (or parallel worlds).
Modernism (the real world), on the one hand.
On the other hand, there is the past (or the realm of the dead) (not entirely sure).
Since I can't really describe it in the real world, there's a young woman.
And in the realm of the dead, a young soldier (uniform similar to those of the soldiers from Pirates of the Caribbean).
For some reason, their paths cross and a plot is created.
The antagonist is also a soldier from the realm of the dead, who wants to bring the woman into this realm in order to be able to live himself, I mean.
I believe the transition is also the grave of the soldier.
In the end, I think both soldiers are fighting against each other.
If that means anything to you, I am grateful for any response.
Our little one only slept on her tummy from week 1.
Fast forward: I'm still alive :D
Relax.
A child can take a lot more than you think.
Make sure that everything around it is right, no cuddly toys, go in from time to time and have a look, but no minutes of surveillance.
That makes you crazy!
Fresh air in the room.
A good mattress.
No pillows.
Oh, and ours didn't have a sleeping bag, but always had a blanket.
Take a look at your child when he or she is sleeping.
Does it turn its head to the side?
Can it lift itself up from its belly?
Or does it lie face down directly in the mattress?
You can tell from that whether everything is in order.
We have also all grown up and when my husband was born, for example, it was commonplace to put the kids on your stomach to sleep.
Furthermore, we are already "regular customers" with you, and have already bought a lot of items
But why are you only offering me 20 euros?
Hello, I have already written to a colleague of yours yesterday and have not yet received a reply.
It's about my wardrobe, which arrived yesterday (order number: #ALPHANUMERIC-ID#).
The right-hand drawer does not fit in the cupboard.
Please contact me as soon as possible.
The cupboard is currently unusable.
To put it simply.
RBTV has promised a lot.
And yes, I know myself that not everything can be held.
And I also had a lot of fun with RBTV.
It's just that the politics of this station are now the pits.
Almost every format is sponsored (okay), but then go on a big begging tour at the same time.
It was said to be an "independent" internet broadcaster.
Quote from Arno: "We don't want to be a running Litfaßsäule."
What are you now?
An 0815 advertising channel that is trying to sell its BilloMerch to the elite fan.
And then we have Marah's do's and don'ts.
The rules apply to everyone, except Simon and Etienne.
They can of course continue to insult people.
A Krogmann, who is completely lacking in empathy, and who is trying to make ashes out of the action at the expense of rented rooms that have been blown up.
How can you like all of this?
Great if you like it, I find it horrible.
I request a call back as my delivered wooden table is defective.
Corpus fracture due to damaged delivery of the #PRS_ORG#.
Whether as a comfort for stomach ache or just for cuddling - my little warmth friend is versatile.
Cherry pit pillows are a traditional home remedy for soothing heat applications, as cherry pits are very good at absorbing and releasing heat in a controlled manner.
The removable inner cushion can be easily heated in the microwave or oven.
The soft cover makes the application particularly pleasant, so that the little ones can feel comfortable, even when they are not feeling well.
The cherry pit pillow with cover is suitable as a heat pack exclusively for the following areas of application:
Before heating, check for unusual smell, stock or burn marks and dispose of immediately if present.
Please remove the inner cushion from the cover to warm it up!
Heat in the microwave at max. 300 watts for max. 2 minutes (follow the instructions of the microwave manufacturer!)
Immediately after heating, distribute the heat evenly in the cushion by shaking it!
Then put the inner cushion back into the cover.
During the first heating, there may be a slight formation of moisture on the surface, but this disappears with repeated applications.
Be sure to follow the recommended heating instructions, as longer times or higher energy levels can cause damage (flaming and burning hazard!).
Check the manufacturer's instructions before warming the pillow in the microwave to see if heating cereal products is permitted.
After putting the heated inner cushion back into the cover, please check the temperature of the cushion for suitability for babies (max. 43 °C) at your elbow!
Do not use the pillow for acute and chronic, inflammatory or feverish illnesses, circulatory problems, fresh bruises, bleeding, and open wounds, and for people with reduced pain sensitivity.
If you have existing skin, heart, vein, diabetes or tumour conditions, or if you are pregnant, please consult a doctor before use.
If seams have opened and loose kernels are escaping, dispose of the product and the loose kernels immediately and out of reach of children.
If the product is used on babies under 1 year old, the child's temperature should be checked regularly during use to prevent overheating!
All serious incidents associated with the product should be reported to the manufacturer and the relevant authority of the country in which the user is registered.
The cover is removable and can be washed in the machine at 30 °C.
Please note the care symbols on the product!
Darmstadt is second after the first leg - Pauli wins in Düsseldorf
Darmstadt 98 can dream of a return to the football Bundesliga.
Meanwhile, Hannover 96 is working its way out of the table cellar.
Under the third trainer, things are not going well for Ingolstadt.
Jubilation in Darmstadt after the late victory in the top game, joy in Hanover over interim coach Christoph Dabrowski, and frustration in Ingolstadt after the failed debut under the new coach Rüdiger Rehm.
Is the battery broken?
Last night my laptop (ThinkPad E480 20KQ and about 3 years old) was no longer being charged by my power supply.
This I bought about 5 months ago, so it should still work.
I thought that the power supply alone was enough to run it.
No luck, the battery is dead and the laptop won't start despite a plugged-in power supply.
So I took out the battery, but nothing happened here either.
Maybe you have ideas?
A new battery has been ordered, but why can't I use the laptop in online mode?
Is something else broken?
Thank you for your help!
I want the delivery of the #PRS_ORG# to my room.
How can I book it?
I'm interested in the #PRS_ORG# chair.
But I don't know how high the seat is....
Often on tour and still carrying a lot of equipment?
No problem with the Peak Design Everyday V2 Backpack!
With a 20-litre capacity, it can also swallow larger photo equipment with ease, which can be safely stored using the padded FlexFold dividers.
And what else you need in terms of everyday items remains well organised and can be separated from the photo equipment thanks to the practical access points in the individually configurable interior.
With the "update" of the Everyday Line to version 2 (V2), the series is presented in a new look.
The stylish, minimalist design has it all - with the Everyday Backpack series, Peak Design has developed some highly innovative solutions that reliably protect the interior of the backpack while at the same time allowing quick access to the photo equipment.
This can be done in two ways: Firstly, the conventional way through the lid flap, which can be closed with the MagLatch closure system, a well-thought-out solution for effective protection that has already proven itself in the Messenger Bags.
A metal closure catch with matching anchor bars on the front of the backpack is located in the closure flap.
Unlike most backpacks, Peak Design has considered different “fill levels”: there are 4 anchor bars, stably riveted, into which the closure hook can be hooked.
If the backpack is fully loaded, you simply take the top bar, if it is rather empty, a lower one.
The flap closure and hook are also magnetic.
This way, the backpack can also be reliably closed without engaging the hook.
The second possibility also fundamentally distinguishes the Everyday Backpack from other photo backpacks: in addition to the cover flap, there is also a zip opening on both sides of the backpack.
This eliminates the biggest drawback of traditional backpacks with top access - you no longer have to dig through the contents!
At the same time, this clever detail greatly increases the everyday usability of the backpack: If you take not only your camera equipment, but also everyday items or travel luggage.
With the Everyday Backpack, you can configure the interior individually (more on that below) and thus store both things separately - and access them independently through the two side openings.
You can also pull the backpack out from the right side of your body to access the camera gear in the right main compartment, while your everyday items stay safely in the left half of the backpack and don't get in the way.
Comfortable, easy-to-adjust carrying straps help with this.
And since the outer shell of the backpack is also completely made from 100% recycled, weatherproof nylon, the contents will stay dry even if it goes to Scotland in the fall.
Unfortunately, I have been waiting in vain for an email from their support.
#NAME# sent me an email yesterday confirming the appointment of the
The shipping company has announced that it will pick up the wrongly delivered table.
Up until now, I have not received any message.
I ask for an immediate settlement.
I'm already in contact with the third support employee, and with none of them I got further than the promise that I would get an email as confirmation.
This is the return of the wrongly delivered Custom #NAME#.
Is it foreseeable when the wardrobe could be delivered again?
To keep him is not an option for me...
It works.
Thank you very much for the help
Wishing you a good evening.
Hello, my order number is #NUMBER#. When will the item be delivered?
The order and payment were on 12.1.21.
A completely different lamp was delivered to me than I ordered
Please call me
If you extend the voucher, then I will place a larger order, but at least I have kept the damaged piece of furniture and not sent it back.
And that the past year turned out differently than expected, I could not have foreseen, and so I was not able to redeem and clarify it in a timely manner.
But the damage has been done to me as a customer, and I don't accept that.
Rotinger brake discs are designed for the requirements of the dynamic driver who knows how to appreciate reliability and safety when braking, even under difficult conditions.
Rotinger brake discs are cast and then mechanically processed (drilled and cut).
All tinted windows are manufactured in short runs according to individual technical characteristics, which are specific to certain windows and patterns.
On the basis of the individual technical drawing, a special manufacturing program is created, which is adjusted to the balancing of the disc according to the properties of the original assembly.
The modified windshields produced in this way ensure high levels of comfort and braking effectiveness.
The additional cut-outs increase the effectiveness of cooling the disc, while the cuts improve the cleaning of the brake discs and brake pads.
The aesthetic properties of our customized windows emphasize the character of each car through its attractive and eye-catching appearance.
Coloma is the town where an unexpected event shaped the history of the West Coast.
In the winter of 1848, a man discovered glowing nuggets in the water at the southern fork of the American River.
Although he tried to keep his discovery secret, the news spread quickly and triggered the so-called "California Gold Rush" of '49.
Thousands came from near and far to make Coloma one of the fastest growing and prosperous towns in the country.
Sections were staked out, tents were erected, and saloons and hotels sprang up almost overnight.
Everyone wanted their share of the country's wealth.
For many, it was "Coloma or Bust" (Coloma or Bust)!
In this game you are a pioneer looking for riches in the West and wanting to make a name for yourself.
You'll search for gold, recruit workers, gather horses, and build companies.
You will also have the opportunity to explore the surrounding rivers and adjoining areas.
You're not alone - other pioneers seem to have the same idea!
You need to outperform your fellow pioneers or you go bust like the rest of them.
Coloma is a fast-paced strategy game with many paths to victory.
Simultaneously, you choose your actions, manage your resources, and build a tableau that works more and more for you ("engine building").
The buildings on your tableau allow you to be more efficient, gain additional actions, or bend the rules in your favor.
With these buildings and the dynamic bridge tiles, you can develop your own individual playstyle with fine adjustments.
Coloma covers a span of three years from 1848 (the year gold was discovered in Coloma), through 1849 (the year of the California Gold Rush) to 1850 (the year California became an official state).
A year in Coloma consists of five rounds.
On each turn, players secretly and simultaneously choose a location on the board where they can perform actions.
Then, their selection is revealed and they place their Pioneers in the appropriate locations.
If a location has the most pioneers, it gets locked!
This deactivates one half of the location - reducing the possible actions there.
Then players take turns performing actions such as gathering resources, moving wagons, setting up tents, scouting rivers, building bridges, opening stores, and placing gunfighters.
When all actions are completed, the Pioneers return.
The spinner rotates to a new location at the start of each round, thereby changing the available actions.
This continues until the demonstrator has moved five times, i.e. covered each location once, and the year ends.
There is a shoot-out in which the players must defend Coloma from a raid by angry bandits.
When players have contributed enough gunslingers and outnumber the bandits, they earn rewards.
But if they fail, they get lower rewards or end up in the graveyard.
The game ends after the third shootout, and then the final score is announced.
The player with the most victory points wins!
For free delivery, I use up to the dimensions 35 x 25 x 4.5 cm the shipping method, goods delivery (games wrapped in foil).
For everything else, usually with DPD, insured and with tracking (wrapped in cellophane, wrapped in tiles and packing paper).
If you are a collector, I can also send the box in a box for an extra charge of 2 euros to ensure 100% no creases.
"Why Children Aren't Tyrants" documentary, ARD Mediathek
CW: psychological violence, sexual abuse, abuse of power
The ARD documentary appeared in my Twitter timeline today and I watched it straight away.
>The child psychiatrist Michael Winterhoff is a frequent guest on talk shows and gives talks all over Europe.
With his book "Why Our Children Become Tyrants" (2008), he triggered a fierce educational debate.
Former patients and legal guardians are now making serious allegations against him.
Please watch out, the film is hard to endure.
And I'm very grateful that many people now think and act differently.
It must never, never, never be about power over the child for us parents and other responsible persons.
Our goal must always be to give the child space for its development and to make the framework for the child as large as it is sensible and possible in the situation.
Brrr, it still chills me to the bone.
Holetschek: Countries are discussing the end of the test requirement for triple-vaccinated people
The health ministers of the federal states want to decide on a nationwide end to the testing requirement for triple-vaccinated people at their next meeting.
"We countries need quick clarity on whether and when the testing requirement can be lifted for those who have been vaccinated three times," said Klaus Holetschek (CSU), chairman of the Health Ministers' Conference, to "Bild am Sonntag".
The end of 2G plus for triple-vaccinated people is "not only medically sensible, but also provides an additional incentive to get vaccinated", said Holetschek.
Federal Minister of Health Karl Lauterbach (SPD) has agreed "that he will make a proposal to the Conference of Ministers of Health as early as next Tuesday". − afp
So, I want to send the lamp back
What's the best way to go about this?
Hi, I think the #PRS_ORG# chair is very nice, but I can't see how high the seat is.
Can you help me?
I can no longer shop through my #PRS_ORG#.
Notice: Oops, an error has occurred.
Shopping via the #PRS_ORG# website works on a computer.
I've updated my account details.
What could be the reason for this?
What you describe is called "awareness," which is sensory perception under general anesthesia.
These occur with a frequency of approximately 1 in 1000.
The most common type of hallucination is hearing sounds/voices, less common is seeing images, and the least common is feeling pain.
Relevant to this topic: Caesarean sections are operations that come with an increased rate of awareness, as a very deep anaesthetic is avoided to protect the baby until it is weaned.
Previous episodes of awareness should be mentioned during the pre-operative interview.
Certain types of anaesthesia, such as total intravenous anaesthesia (TIVA), carry a slightly increased risk.
**EDIT: Hey everyone, this comment of mine describes awareness correctly, however, u/Nitemarex by definition had none.
I misread her comment.
But the chair is broken.
Unfortunately, the 20 euros won't help us either.
These are statutory warranty claims.
At the very least, they should take back the broken chair.
In addition to the legal obligation, this is standard practice in eCommerce.
Please check if they will at least take back the broken chair.
We will then sell the second chair privately.
We also lose a lot of money.
I've already sent you an email, which you didn't respond to.
Again, the question.
The order and the invoice state that the goods will be delivered to a room of my choice.
The freight forwarder is company #NAME#.
I just called there.
I was told they only deliver to the front door - due to #PRS_ORG#.
Is that so?
If so, I will have to cancel the order because I don't know anyone who can carry the heavy furniture up to the first floor.
Will I not be called?
I was asking a question
Theater historian Günther Rühle, 97, has died
He has made a name for himself as a theatre critic and as a director.
Later, he wrote a monumental history of theatre.
On Friday, Günther Rühle died at the age of 97.
The new book is still on the table, hot off the press: "An old man grows older".
The shattering diary of a slow farewell to the world, which the theatre historian and journalist Günther Rühle kept until April 2021.
And in the middle of reading comes the news that the author has died.
The last sentence in the book reads: "I already testify my gratitude for life here".
There are different types of pallets.
One of the most common are Europallets, standardized wooden pallets that are mainly used as load carriers in the European space.
They are certified by the European Pallet Association (EPAL)
According to data from Statistics Austria, more than ten million pallets were produced in Austria in 2020.
The production value was around 79 million euros.
The number of pallets imported into Austria each year is not recorded
New York win the MLS championship for the first time
New York City FC have won the Major League Soccer title for the first time.
After the 1-1 in regular time against the host Portland Timbers, the team from the Eastern Conference won the final in the penalty shoot-out with 4-2.
In the Eastern Conference finals, New York had defeated Philadelphia Union, the team of German Kai Wagner.
Rouladen Tips & Tricks
I got a lot of great tips here last week for the perfect goulash.
It was for Christmas and it was unbelievably delicious and melt-in-your-mouth!
So thanks again for that :)
Now I've got a taste for it and want to cook rouladen for the first time on New Year's Eve.
Tomorrow I will make a beef stock for it.
Do you have any other tips for me?
Note: I don't have an oven, just a big pot.
What happens now?
What about my books or how do I get them back on my #PRS_ORG#?
My English isn't as good as it used to be, but I can manage
It's about a refund of €#NUMBER#
I was already informed by e-mail on 18.01 that the refund had been made.
But to this day, the money has not arrived.
Please check that.
Where you can still get Christmas roast in the Lübeck area
For many people, goose or duck is as much a part of Christmas as the Christmas tree and the presents.
They haven't gotten their poultry yet?
Now time is tight.
We tell you where you can still get a Christmas roast in the Lübeck area.
The "Drive" of a tube power amplifier contributes significantly to the warmth and fatness of the guitar amplifier's sound.
These characteristics are perfectly implemented by the Valve Reactor circuit.
With the VOLUME, GAIN, and MASTER VOLUME controls, you can set the desired volume level and the amount of distortion in your sounds.
In addition, the VT+ series amps feature a unique POWER LEVEL control that allows you to reduce the sound level without changing the "gain" or distortion.
Further above, it was already mentioned that with the POWER LEVEL adjuster, one can even make a power reserve available quickly, if it gets unacceptably loud.
Thanks to the POWER LEVEL controller, the full potential of the VT+ series can be used in every situation.
The headphone jack can also be used as a line output.
The signal attached here is processed with a box simulation, so that you get an eminent "acoustic" sound impression even when using headphones or direct recordings.
A CD or MP3 player can be plugged into the AUX port so you can jam to your favourite songs.
A tuner function is also on board, so you don't need a separate tuner.
Anyone who additionally buys a VFS5 footswitch can call up the sounds with their feet, turn the effect blocks on and off, and "tap" the tempo of the compatible effects.
This is actually indispensable for live use.
With its new power packages, VOX is taking another step into the future!
But I've seen that with others.
Is it possible to send the lamp back?
Because it's too low for over a dining table?
So, I would like to send them back.
Can you help me with that?
And what about the chest of drawers?
Will we receive another update on the exact delivery date in the coming weeks?
Hi, have you ever sat on the #PRS_ORG# chairs
If that doesn't work, I would also be satisfied with a discount or a voucher.
I might be able to find a buyer for the furniture.
More than 1,000 euros for goods that I don't need is a bit too much.
I have just received my delivery and would have liked to know if screws were included as part of the delivery.
I would like to install the #PRS_ORG# mirror (door) on the intended hook.
That's not a satisfactory answer and the wait has not been worth it
Do you have a premium customer status?
Iran sees progress in nuclear deal talks
According to Iranian reports, progress is being made in the negotiations on the revival of the international nuclear agreement.
"Both sides are on the verge of agreeing on the issues to be discussed on the agenda," Iran's chief negotiator, Ali Bagheri, told the Iranian news agency Irna on Sunday.
This is a "positive and important development", because initially there was not even agreement on the issues to be negotiated.
The agreement is supposed to prevent Iran from building nuclear weapons.
On Thursday, the Vienna talks to revive the agreement continued after a nearly one-week break.
Iranian, German, British, Chinese, French and Russian negotiators are taking part in the negotiations.
A US delegation is also in Vienna, but is only indirectly involved in the negotiations.
Thuringia overtakes Saxony - Free State is now the federal state with the highest Corona incidence
Thuringia has surpassed Saxony and currently has the highest incidence rate in the country.
As the only federal state, the value is above the mark of 1000.
Thuringia was the only federal state to have a corona incidence rate above 1000 on Sunday.
The Robert Koch Institute gave the seven-day value with 1025 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants.
In Saxony, which had always shown the highest incidence rate nationwide, this value was 990.5 on Sunday.
On Friday and Saturday, the incidence in Thuringia had fallen slightly, but had also been above the value of 1000.
In Thuringia, 2242 new infections with the Sars-CoV-2 virus and 16 further deaths in connection with an infection were reported within one day.
On Sunday, 200 severely ill Covid-19 patients were being treated in hospitals in intensive care units.
There may be delays in reporting at weekends.
In addition, the health departments have been overloaded for weeks and are hardly able to keep up with the registration of new cases.
I understand that.
Since the delivery is not until the beginning of March, it may be possible by then.
I have to print it out, stick it on the package and take it to the post office, that's it or?
here I don't have to click/specify/fill in anything else?
That is exactly what I want to avoid, which is why I am writing to you.
I would like to take responsibility for the return at my own cost, please.
An 8 euro return fee in my opinion is a cheek.
It's time for change
###Hello Bundestag, I'm u/StratorDE in the plenary hall in the heart of Europe on a fantastic day!
#Why is the post here?
If one looks at the activity of the Bundestag over the past few months, one thing becomes clear: it does not exist.
We've fallen into a winter slump and extended the summer doldrums for a few months.
#Where is the problem?
Yes, what was the problem?
For the most part, it's simply down to dissatisfaction with how some things have gone here and how we stand in general.
In recent days, it has become increasingly clear that many people here are still really interested in the Bundestag.
#What we have to change
At this point, the community around the Bundestag is being asked, which wants to keep it alive.
The impetus came from u/edizVEVO, who became aware of this project in the last few days and found, to put it simply, a mess.
After some back-and-forth, several people from the community have come together who are interested in rebuilding the project.
However, I would also like to once again call on everyone to take part, only in this way can this project continue to exist in the future.
We have created a discussion platform in the form of a Discord server, on which we can exchange ideas and work out concrete things.
You can join the server via this link.
Goals:
* How should the Bundestag work in the future?
* What existing orders need to be changed/amended/removed?
* How should we present ourselves to the outside world in the future?
* How will new members be recruited?
* How do we create a fair electoral system?
I'm pretty sure that I've forgotten some things, but that's not a problem, we have Discord at the end of the day.
If you're interested and have the time, come to the discord, work with us and let us decide democratically about the future.
I have ordered a lampshade from you, which is yet to be delivered.
Now I see that the article is too big/clumsy for that and not suitable to my taste.
For this reason I have already ordered a different suspension from you.
I put it together and then noticed this as I took the soft foam.
Very sad about that.
I hope that this is returned and I have a full refund.
This is also quite sad, as the #NAME# is much darker than expected.
I have one more question: does the day cover #PRS_ORG# also come in a larger size, for example 240/240?
#PRS_ORG# must be able to guarantee that the defective cupboard will be collected in a timely manner.
And I ask you to make that happen now.
I don't have suitable packaging, but I will dismantle the cupboard as far as possible for collection. They must clarify with #PRS_ORG# how this can work.
#PRS_ORG# can call me at any time to arrange a collection.
Is there an instruction for the assembly?
How long would I have to get them or to decide to return them?
How do you respond to the question of why you're vegan?
Today, I had a conversation with a colleague that I like.
She herself lived as a vegetarian for a while, and probably eats meat very rarely these days.
I myself was also a vegetarian for several years.
When asked if I have always wanted to be vegan and vegetarianism was just a planned stepping stone, I answered honestly without much thought.
And that I thought for a long time that I was supporting animal welfare as a vegetarian, but at some point I reflected and understood that I was ultimately also supporting animal cruelty.
Hence, my decision to become vegan.
In that moment, I had the impression that there was discontent on her side; she then defended vegetarianism and said she knew where her meat came from and that vegetarians reduce animal suffering.
Now I wonder if my answer was too "blunt"?
How does she answer the question?
I have the feeling that as a vegan you are quickly put into a corner and conflicts arise, without you wanting it.
A peace-loving vegan greets you (;
This is clearly not an exception under section 312d of the German Civil Code.
Your #PRS_ORG# does not exempt you from the legal requirements for distance selling.
I'm not home on the appointed date that #PRS_ORG# is picking up my return.
As I cannot be there in person because of a funeral, unfortunately this cannot be changed.
I would like to be assigned an alternative pick-up date, please.
From 01.02.#NUMBER#, I will be available again continuously.
Lahnsteiner Wehr equipped for water rescue: 45,000 euro grant from the state
Recently, the Rhineland-Palatinate Minister of the Interior, Roger Lewentz, handed over a funding notice in the amount of 45,000 euros for the new water rescue vehicle of the Lahnstein volunteer fire department to the mayor of Lahnstein, Peter Labonte.
The total cost of the vehicle, which has been in service since November 2020, amounted to 135,000 euros.
A good and important investment in security.
I'm pleased that the state of Rhineland-Palatinate is supporting us here," says Lahnstein's mayor, Peter Labonte.
The equipment wagon is used by the Lahnstein diving unit, one of a total of seven units in Rhineland-Palatinate.
Above and under water, they carry out tasks in water and ice rescue as well as technical assistance.
In Lahnstein, they are counting on permanent increases in calls: The boom in hotel shipping on the Rhine and Mosel, as well as the continued increase in the use of the Lahn as a leisure river, contribute to this.
I bought a book that I could only read 10% of and then the problems began.
I can't open the book.
I have followed their recommendations however synchronising, removing and reloading the app has NOT worked.
I'm a bit frustrated because the whole action has already cost me a lot of time, and I'm now hoping for help.
Okay, that's how it is then.
I would like to order 3 items from the #PRS_ORG# collection for June.
Can I enter a time in the ordering process?
According to the ANSI/PLATO FL1 standard, the aforementioned values were measured in the Fenix laboratory at 21°C±3°C, 50%-80% humidity and the built-in 275mAh LiPo battery.
Values may vary depending on flashlight used, age, and environment.
*: The burn time in the level Bright includes the burn time with reduced brightness due to overheating protection.
2) Retailers are responsible for customers.
Customers should contact the retailers or distributors from whom they purchased Fenix lights for warranty support, with the Fenixlight Limited "warranty card" and either a sales invoice or receipt.
Fenix will provide our authorized dealers with the technology and parts necessary for the maintenance of our lights.
1) 15-day free replacement: Fenix will replace a new product within 15 days after purchase due to possible manufacturing defects if problems occur during normal use.
We will replace it with the same model.
When the model is discontinued, customers receive a product with a similar or improved model.
2) Free repair for 5 years: Fenix offers a free repair within 5 years from the date of purchase if a problem occurs during normal use.
Different guarantee periods for different products:
Other products or free offers from Fenix are not covered by the product guarantee, except for the products and accessories listed above.
3) Limited Lifetime Warranty: For fixtures that have exceeded the free warranty period for repairs, we offer lifetime repairs, but charge a fee for parts.
The dealer tells the customer the cost of the part before the repair.
4) Warranty Certificate: Customers request customer service from Fenix dealers or retailers by presenting a completed Fenix warranty card, a purchase receipt, or a receipt.
The distributor should offer the customer services, and Fenix will support these services.
5) The free warranty does not cover damage or failure caused by:
Any defects or damage caused by misuse, including, but not limited to, operation not in accordance with the warranty or instructions in the product specifications.
For example, the product specification describes that the sealed head should not be disassembled, as this may damage the flashlight and invalidate the warranty.
Any defects or damage caused by other behaviours cannot be reasonably controlled by Fenix.
6) To make a warranty claim, please contact our Warranty Department with the following information: Name, Type/Model of Warranty Item, Serial Number.
Thank you first of all for standing up to the whole thing here, I have also spent nearly a decade in public service in a similar capacity, i.e. we were also armed officers in the executive, I don't want to go into this any further!
The question of right and left always seems to me to be asked very simplistically.
In principle, however, one should say that, of course, the state official is more likely to come from the liberal to conservative spectrum and not from the revolutionary left, which should be clear to everyone.
Of course, it should also be clear to everyone that these people then, of course, have a hard time dealing with the lived reality. It should also be clear that, in addition to the average white person, there are now many Germans with a migration background, women, and also homosexuals (and by this I do not mean the over-the-top feminine stereotype queer, because there are rather few to none of these in the executive, but rather normal men and women who you do not notice if they do not tell you), and on these people I can and must rely, because in doubt, they will save your life or put it on the line for you.
But even these fringe groups represent a conservative attitude, in my experience, i.e. they are proud of Germany and feel less understood by over-the-top left-wing politics, even though this politics supposedly stands up for them or claims to do so. They simply want to be treated normally.
Returning to the right-wingers, since of course the police and armed forces are also a cross-section of society, you will also find extreme right-wingers there, but that they are allowed to openly express their views there or even openly hatch state-threatening plans is completely exaggerated in the media and also annoys me.
Of course it happens that police officers and soldiers, who have often been deployed abroad, begin to generalise due to negative experiences and sometimes say things that are controversial or even politically incorrect.
It also happens that right-wing like-minded people meet and have a lively exchange of ideas.
Nevertheless, I think that this kind of thing is well combated, and political education and enlightenment is also used against it!
Germany is so very international, and that's a good thing, in my opinion. We could never afford to have real racists and Nazis in our ranks!
Yes, what I don't understand is that I also ordered the other basket on the German side.
Why should this come from England?
When I ordered, it wasn't sold out.
I ordered in November already.
but it was confirmed to me in your confirmation of the order
It is still about my order that is no longer deliverable.
I had been chatting with #NAME# earlier.
Alternatively, one could have the other #PRS_ORG# basket for #NUMBER# Euro in black delivered to Germany or is this basket also available in Germany.
I can only ever find you as a partner company.
but at the top edge of the wood part are two deep grooves that have been filled with something yellow
And there is a small scratch on the mirror itself
Normal for a child?
Hello, I (w32) have been concerned about something for some time.
I am very disciplined and organised at work (I am self-employed, with very little free time), but I have always struggled to keep my household permanently clean and tidy.
There are always phases when everything stays the same, and then every now and then it gets to me and I tidy up and clean.
But it's never really "that someone might just drop in for a visit."
My husband is (unfortunately) not better, it bothers me a bit but usually the household simply loses against work and laziness.
The kitchen is cleaned most regularly because we like to cook.
Now for my question, did you manage to become more organised with your child?
We don't have one yet but we are working on it and this question has been on my mind for a long time.
Because for me, I have no incentive, it just doesn't bother me so much, as long as no visitors come and, for example, there is always fresh clothing and the kitchen is usable.
Do you have a bigger incentive with a child or do you stay sloppy?
I look forward to your answers.
Exclusive, new, high-quality and anatomically pre-shaped cut offers maximum comfort, a perfect fit and thus almost unrestricted freedom of movement.
Preformed with special, further shaping at the joints for improved mobility (at the elbows and knees)
For the Focea Comfort 4, the area covered by the Flex System 2 was more than doubled to further increase comfort.
Seamless stretch panels at the joints reduce friction (armpits, arm and knee bends)
High-quality pre-shaping in the lower back area and in the crotch ensure a close-fitting, perfect fit.
Elaskin 8.8 stretch panel in the lumbar area increases flexibility around the back-zipper and improves comfort, especially when bending down and when mounting and removing equipment on the surface.
The Free Flex Zone around the shoulders and back ensures increased freedom of movement for the arms and back.
Fireskin is a warming, water-resistant material with a special surface structure that provides a high degree of cold protection.
Placed on the chest, it brings warmth to a sensitive area of the body.
Seamless, thin (-2 mm) face seal on hood increases comfort, seal and durability (separate hood)
The soft, collar-based zone improves the seal with a fine-adjustable width adjustment via a flexible, gentle hook-and-loop closure, which does not stick to the coating or the seams
Double cuffs with zippers at the wrists and ankles connect a fold-back inner cuff to a soft, camouflaged neoprene outer cuff
45° indentation at the end of the inner sleeve for increased elasticity and durability when putting on.
Long zip at the neck with an Elaskin reinforcement, for an anatomical cut with increased comfort on the overall without a hood
Long G-Lock P back zipper (overall without hood) with metal slider and integrated Water Dam System for improved sealing (Beuchat patent)
Zippers on the arms and legs
Neoprene reinforcements at all ends of the zips to prevent ripping if too much force is applied.
Neoprene panels glued flush with outer and inner overlap
The edges of the outer cuffs are edged for greater durability
Ribs on the inner cuffs for increased flexibility
The original Beuchat system was designed to hold the computer in place, especially on deeper dives (the system is compatible with all common wrist-mounted computers)
A career in social work - as someone with a borderline personality disorder?
I did an apprenticeship in software development and have now been qualified for about a year.
Unfortunately, I'm increasingly realising that this profession isn't the right one for me, which is why I've been thinking for a long time about starting all over again and studying social work.
The problem: I have an avoidant (or anxious avoidant) personality disorder (APD).
Roughly speaking, this means that I have no self-esteem and am therefore shy.
I have no problem talking to people on a professional level, but I find it very hard to have casual conversations and I've been told that I come across as unapproachable (which I think I've improved on).
Can I become a social worker this way?
I don't want to work as a street worker or in an open youth club, but rather in areas such as addiction counselling or family assistance.
However, I don't know if the actual working day is really like how I imagine it, and it's difficult to find something about it on the Internet.
The ÄVPS is already causing problems (for me, emotionally) in my job now, because it drags me down every time there's something wrong with my code ("messed up the simplest things again") and it's hard for me to ask more experienced colleagues for help ("I should really know how to do this by now"/"I'm holding him back from his work with my stupid questions"/"he must think I'm really stupid" etc.).
I'll probably have problems in every job but I wanted to mention it here.
But have you already got your sofa back?
Because for that, there was also no confirmation.
I'm waiting for an appointment to pick it up
What do they mean by 'please give it back'?
When I download a book on the #PRS_ORG# I get the message Your #PRS_ORG# does not authorise this book
Is there a problem there?
I was on chat with #PRS_ORG and they asked me if I'd received a delivery confirmation for my wardrobe.
The protein (protein) taken in with the food is broken down by the bird in its gastrointestinal tract into the individual protein building blocks (amino acids) and builds its own body proteins from these, which it also needs for feather formation.
The formation of feathers in the nestling and the formation of new feathers in the moulting bird are extremely complex processes and are associated with a particularly high burden for the animal's total organism.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio must not be administered during the breeding season, as this could lead to disruptions in the hatching process.
Following this meandering gift of NEKTON-Bio, the daily vitamin supply with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral preparation) should be resumed.
The protein taken in with the food is broken down in the bird's gastrointestinal tract into the individual protein building blocks (amino acids), which are then used to build the bird's own protein, which it also needs for feather formation.
The formation of plumage in the nestling and the formation of new plumage in the moulting bird are extremely complex processes and are associated with a particularly high strain on the overall organism of the animal.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio must not be given during breeding, as otherwise it can lead to disruptions in the hatching process.
Following this circuitous gift of NEKTON-Bio, the daily vitamin supply with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral substance preparation) should be resumed.
1g of NEKTON-Bio in 250 ml of water or 100g of soft food.
It is only recommended to prepare as much drinking water/soft food as the bird consumes daily and to change the water/food daily.
One level measuring spoon (included) is equal to 1 g of NEKTON-Bio.
In case of severe feather damage, a double or triple dose of NEKTON-Bio can be given in the beginning, until the start of feather regrowth is visible.
After that, the normal dose is given until the feather regrowth is complete.
Storage: NEKTON-Bio should be stored in a dry place, out of direct sunlight and between 15° and 25°C.
Sorry, but the chair is being sold as an office chair.
How can an office chair break after 9 months?
Warranty claims in Germany are for 24 months.
That's really bad service.
Hi, I sent an email on Monday to let you know my order had arrived damaged with pictures attached.
Did you receive this email?
A statement by a municipal employee contradicting the by-law
Hello r/LegaladviceGerman,
I have the following problem.
A walnut tree is to be cut down on our property.
Therefore, a felling application was submitted to the municipality.
An employee writes to me that the felling of fruit trees, and thus also the walnut, is not part of the by-laws.
However, in the by-laws, the walnut is explicitly listed as a tree to be protected.
Can I rely on the employee's statement or not?
On the one hand, I have to be able to rely on an expert's opinion.
On the other hand, the constitution is clear.
Thank you for your answers
We understand that.
Then, we will use the new packaging for it.
I haven't received a message
Well, then I still have a sofa without use.
Could you offer me a discount or a voucher?
What was more expensive?
Yes, I believe so, but the question is whether I can pay in euros and have the blanket delivered to Germany.
Can you check that?
Breaking news: Heavy traffic accident in Selb
Recently, a serious traffic accident occurred on the St 2179 between the Selb-Nord junction and Plößberg.
According to the current police press release (14:03), a car came into oncoming traffic while overtaking.
There are injuries.
Ah okay, I understand.
Well, thanks again for making it so easy!
Advice and ideas for further professional life
First of all, happy Christmas to you!
My Christmas is unfortunately not very good, because my dear head is currently destroying everything that can be thought of.
Before I go into detail now ... in short: I need advice and preferably from people who know my situation in some way - i.e. from you.
I'm currently doing the Ref as a lateral entrant.
Originally, I studied something else and worked in a different field there (in order to remain at least somewhat anonymous, I will not name anything more specific here).
However, I found the whole thing too boring, and I started looking for alternatives that would be more fun for me.
At some point, I ended up in the teaching profession and was sure that this was it - even if the framework conditions are much less flexible than in my previous profession, but I didn't care.
I'm now at the third "I Google other job postings" stage.
And it's only been half a year.
In the games before, I always decided to keep going and at least finish the ref, after that I can always change course.
But right now, I am absolutely exhausted.
I've had so little free time in the last month that I'm completely burnt out.
Now it's the holidays, but there's still a lot of work waiting for me.
Before the referee, I always thought I was stress-resistant, but there, my weekend was my weekend and my evening off was my evening off.
That's when I was free.
And the stress at work didn't matter in those moments.
Now even family celebrations are too much stress for me.
And then there are these rigid structures, which stress me out even more.
In principle, it's fun and from the outside it looks like the referee is doing well in terms of feedback and so on.
But I am completely exhausted, and I wonder how much stress my body can take before it completely shuts down - if it hasn't already.
I ask myself whether I want to have this for the rest of my working life - especially if I read some of your contributions here - or whether I should go back to the old area, where I was valued, could take free time when I needed it, and although I found the work a bit boring, I was paid appropriately and worked as part of a team and not as a lone fighter, which is the case most of the time now.
But then I ask myself if in a year's time I won't be back in the same place as I am now and unsatisfied.
You can tell, it's all a bit strange, but maybe you outsiders have some advice or ideas on how I can get out of this situation, which I'm completely done with and start crying at the slightest thought of it.
Decisions will not be made now in such an emotional way, that will probably not lead to anything good.
But perhaps your views will help me to see at least a little bit of light at the end of the tunnel - or be able to enjoy Christmas, which will do for now.
Thanks for reading and sorry for the whiny tone.
I hope that my situation is at least a little bit clear now.
Since its introduction in 2001, VOX's Valvetronix series has continued to evolve, including the combination of advanced modelling technology with the "Valve Reactor" circuit, which perfectly replicates the behaviour of a valve amplifier.
With the VT20X/VT40X/VT100X amps, we are introducing a brand new modeling engine that is absolutely state-of-the-art in terms of sound.
Thanks to VET (Virtual Element Technology), which is based on the analysis of the components and amp circuits, the VTX amplifiers offer an authenticity that is absolutely impressive.
Of course, these amps also contain the multi-stage Valvetronix tube preamp.
This is partly based on real analog circuits, because they just do the sound variations and nuances of a tube amp better than any simulation.
In addition to this sophisticated circuit, the VTX amplifiers feature a sealed enclosure and a bass-reflex system, from which the natural resonances just gush forth.
With VOX's "Tone Room" software, you can even correct and twist historical facts on the virtual level until the amp and effects sound the way you've always imagined.
The perfect combination of tube sound with modeling technology is in the first place thanks to the VOX Valve Reactor technology introduced in 2001.
Of course, it has been refined several times since then to meet new sound requirements, which in 2010 once again resulted in a performance boost for the VOX Valvetronix series - with more dynamics and numerous and significantly improved amplifier models.
From the handy VT20+ to the VT120+ with two speakers, the new VT+ Valvetronix series has been designed so that all guitarists looking for maximum sound variety will find what they are looking for.
All guitarists dream of the drive and dynamics of a tube amplifier: they expect a fat sound, a nuanced reproduction of playing dynamics and string attack, and a quick response.
During an in-depth analysis, the VOX engineers discovered that the output stage in particular determines the tube character of an amplifier, and developed the VOX Valve Reactor technology on the basis of this finding.
Each VT+ amplifier's Valve Reactor circuitry, equipped with a 12AX7 tube, perfectly recreates the behavior, subtle nuances, and sonic character of a tube amplifier.
NBA: Despite Wagner's 20 points: Magic lose to Clippers
The Orlando Magic's losing streak in the NBA continues.
The Wagner brothers can shine - but it's not enough to win against the Los Angeles Clippers.
Despite 20 points from Franz Wagner and seven points from his older brother Moritz, the Magic lost 104-106 to the Los Angeles Clippers on Saturday.
The large main compartment is also customisable: with three individually placed and foldable Velcro dividers, it adapts completely to the needs of your camera equipment and is therefore suitable for all kinds of cameras - from mirrorless system cameras of all sizes to full-frame DSLRs.
What ultimately fits in the backpack depends, of course, on the size of the camera and the lenses.
A possible configuration would be a DSLR camera with a mounted lens, two to three interchangeable lenses, and a mounted flash.
Larger DSLM cameras like the various models of the Sony a7 series or a Fuji X-T2 still have room for additional lenses.
In addition, you can store a lot of accessories.
And if you have a small DSLM camera (Olympus MFT cameras, Fujifilm X-A or E-series) you can use the backpack for your equipment and for non-photo things.
Drone pilots will also make an optimal choice with the Everyday Backpack 20L, as the backpack offers sufficient space for a DJI Mavic Pro including remote control and accessories.
Volcanic eruption on La Palma: probably the longest in history
In the nearly three months since the outbreak began, the lava flows on the Canary Island have caused great damage.
Is an end in sight?
With a duration of now 85 days, the volcanic eruption on La Palma has been the longest in the known history of the Spanish Canary Island since Sunday.
So far, the eruption of the Tehuya volcano in 1585 with 84 days was considered the longest on the Atlantic island off the west coast of Africa.
There are no reliable data on previous outbreaks.
The activity of the unnamed volcano in the Cumbre Vieja has decreased somewhat in recent days, but volcanologists still dare not predict when it could end.
The indicators point to a slowdown.
The best news is that they are stable," the president of the island council, Mariano Hernández Zapata, told the state TV channel RTVE.
Millions of euros worth of damage
In the nearly three months since the eruption began, more than 1,000-degree lava has destroyed nearly 2,900 homes and other buildings, RTVE reported.
Just under 1,200 hectares were covered by a metre-thick layer of lava.
That is almost 1,700 football fields.
More than 7000 residents had to be evacuated, and the damage is estimated at more than 900 million euros.
Two new land protrusions with a total size of about 50 hectares were created off the coast by the cooled lava.
In particular, banana cultivation, which is immensely important for the island and from which about half of the approximately 85,000 inhabitants live directly or indirectly, was severely affected, and which was already in crisis before the volcanic eruption.
225 hectares of banana plantations were destroyed, and other areas were severely affected, wrote the newspaper "El País".
Christmas and the gifts
Christmas is just around the corner, and especially the children will hardly be able to wait for the heavenly festival.
The many colorful gifts under the Christmas tree, combined with the spiritual atmosphere and the crackling tension, have something seductive about them.
Christmas is one of the few traditional occasions that still holds our increasingly divided society together.
It is all the more important to be aware of the Christmas tradition of giving, so that the gesture of giving, which, according to the French sociologist and ethnologist Marcel Mauss, was a "social contract of nature peoples" to establish peace, can escape the rigid routine and be given new life in the context of this tradition.
How Saint Nicholas became the Christ Child
Strictly speaking, it was the Protestants who linked the Christmas days with gift-giving.
Prior to this, gifts were exchanged on St. Nicholas Day in one way or another.
The background to this still-popular tradition is that St. Nicholas, as Bishop of Myra, secretly threw gold through the windows of three women one night to save them from a life of sin.
From this unconventional way of giving gifts came the popular German custom of filling children's boots with gifts.
Protestants objected to this practice because they reject the idea of a mediator between God and man as "saint worship."
For these reasons, they oppose the institution.
Martin Luther made St. Nicholas into the Christ Child and thereby established a new tradition.
As a result, the focus of giving gifts shifted to Christmas Eve.
As most Protestants do not see such details so narrowly, only a few are annoyed that the St. Nicholas tradition, similar to the Martin's Day tradition with Martin's songs and Martin's parade, is still an integral part of the pre-Christmas period.
Today, one can find everything from socks to coveted luxury watches at the front door and under the Christmas tree.
Diversity of traditions in Christian countries
Sources indicate a tradition of gift-giving on St. Nicholas Day since the 13th century.
With the Reformation, the day of giving changed to Christmas Eve.
In all Christian countries, however, there is a happy muddle over the question of who brings the gifts to the children.
In Germany, it depends on the region as to whether the Christ Child appears on Christmas Eve or the Christmas man, who in principle is a kind of Saint Nicholas, to whom over time some peculiarities have been assigned.
These include, for example, his white beard, which only has little in common with the rather strict Assyrian beard of the historical figure, his sleigh pulled by reindeer and the preference for the chimney to gain access to the houses.
In the Netherlands, Saint Nicholas remains the central figure at Christmas.
In Spain, the Three Kings give the gifts, while in Italy, it is Befana, the witch, who is said to have guided them to the baby Jesus.
In Scandinavia, sometimes mythical creatures bring the gifts, while in Russia, Father Frost brought some fame.
It's not reindeer, but three horses that pull his sleigh as a troika.
In the Czech Republic, the motherland of the Reformation in the course of the Hussite Wars, the Christ Child is responsible for the delivery of the presents.
I've been getting this error message for 3 weeks when trying to download a new book, but my account details and contact details are up to date:
Please help me to fix the error, because I
Otherwise buy a different e-book #PRS_ORG#.
I requested a return label for my order #NUMBER# last week and this morning.
I was told that one would be sent to me.
Since I haven't received one yet (not in the spam folder either), I wanted to ask now how long this usually takes.
Thank you very much.
Police shoot suspected bank robber near King's Palace
A man armed with a knife was shot dead by police on Saturday near Kensington Palace in London.
Police said callers reported a man entering a bank and a bookmaker's shop with a gun.
The man fled in a vehicle, which was stopped by officers a short time later, according to authorities.
Shots were fired and the man was hit.
He was pronounced dead at the scene of the crime.
The police did not assume a terrorist background.
The area around Kensington Palace is home to several embassies.
The palace is the official London residence of Prince William, his wife Catherine, and their three children.
Other members of the royal family also live there.
which ones?
No matter where I click, I'm immediately redirected to your page.
The decorative light fits harmoniously into any bed, garden area or rock garden.
The light is simply set up and can be secured in the ground with two ground spikes.
Integrated, powerful 0.4 watt solar module for optimal recharging of the built-in battery.
Light duration max. 10 hours.
- The robust plastic construction is suitable for year-round outdoor use.
In the Hollywood spectacle, it is usually threatening objects from distant galaxies that internally glow in colour.
On the other hand, "Smart Stone" is completely harmless: it is the sun alone that causes this solar light to shine fascinatingly - optionally in white or coloured light (in six different colour tones).
The edge-free, amorphous design is deliberately chosen: like a naturally-formed large pebble, this modern light object presents itself during the day.
Its organic shapes fit into any natural environment - whether on the edge of the terrace, in the lawn or in the rock bed.
He also does well in the company of larger pebbles and boulders, where he can hold his own thanks to his size.
You can save yourself a lot of work: "Smart Stone" does not require a power supply or batteries as a solar light.
Set the "beacon" in any place that is lit by the sun during the day.
Two included ground pegs ensure a stable hold if necessary.
The matt white plastic case itself is robust and weatherproof.
Its solar panel discreetly hides the "Smart Stone" inside, along with its battery and two LEDs - one for white light, the other for coloured light.
The battery already charges when sunlight falls on the case.
When it starts to get dark, "Smart Stone" starts to light up on its own; the colour is up to you: In addition to daylight white, you have six attractive light colours to choose from.
The light is also turned off automatically once the battery level has fallen to a given minimum or it gets light again.
Once the sun shines again, the charging cycle begins again the next day.
I've done that more than once and it doesn't work.
That's a shame, I would have liked to continue ordering from you, but if the voucher is not credited to me, then I will not order from you out of principle.
If you change your mind, let me know.
Otherwise, today was the last contact.
Then please send me the number for the sideboard.
During the lockdown, no DIY store is open anyway...
The motor control of the LokSound 5 has been fundamentally improved once again.
A variable PWM frequency of 10kHz to 50kHz ensures super-quiet operation - the typical "humming" is a thing of the past.
The load control can now be adapted to difficult cases with up to 10 CVs.
The unique "Autotune" feature allows the decoder to automatically match itself to the motor.
The LokSound 5 decoder supplies up to 1.5A of motor current, enough juice even for older motors.
- please use the eBay shopping cart to have the shipping costs calculated correctly.
- You will receive an email with the tracking number.
- You will receive a receipt from the specialist retailer showing the VAT for every purchase of new goods.
We usually process your order or request within 24 hours on working days.
The pill problem
Hello lovely ladies,
I hope I'm doing everything right here, it's actually my first post after a year on reddit.
My problem is that about five years ago, I had to start taking the pill again, mainly because I had such incredibly bad pain during my period and terrible PMS before my period.
Now, I would like to keep it that way, because I already have to take enough medication for my chronic illnesses that I cannot choose myself.
My main problem, surprisingly not the pain, but my skin.
I had gone from 0 to 100 in about two years when I last took a break and I had breakouts all over the place.
So far, so superficial, but it really got to me and I didn't feel comfortable.
In the two-year break, things have never really normalised.
Maybe someone has some tips to avoid this time.
My cosmetics are already perfume-free and without rubbish, but maybe there's something that someone can recommend to me.
Unfortunately, the gynaecologist didn't take me seriously, and I still haven't got an appointment with the dermatologist.
Many thanks to everyone who has read the novel!
Yes, the skin is such a thing.
Had severe neurodermatitis as a pre-teen, then a period of calm, then widespread papulopustular rosacea and the acne issue.
I have also tried all sorts of things in terms of nutrition as part of my chronic illness, and ended up on a diet low in sugar, milk and meat, because nothing else worked very well.
It could also be the case that hormonally, it's just the way it is, but if you, like me, have a building site everywhere, you just don't want to search for anything else that's going wrong.
I already had everything from her colleague, semina, etc.
Written and now I've lost the conversation and don't know what the response to my request was.
I have to work in between and answer the phone, and suddenly it was all gone...
what's there to check, if the money was there, I would have seen it
Please check my bank details, maybe there was something wrong
but is there one in general in large
as it is widely available in black
Zappiti 4K HDR Series - The best movie experience ever!
Zappiti designs and manufactures high-end video management systems; for the best image quality, excellent performance and ultimate user-friendliness.
All Zappiti products are designed to give you convenient and intuitive access to your entire movie library in stunning 4K high-definition resolution.
The award-winning Zappiti players are successfully used worldwide to enhance the movie experience, both in the home and in commercial environments.
The Zappiti Neo supports most digital audio and video formats including the latest 4K HDR standards like Dolby Vision and HDR10+, almost all current video file formats, full BD/UHD menus, HEVC video codec with one billion colors (10-bit color coding), VP-9, 3D video standards with 3D subtitles, high-resolution audio like DSD, FLAC, ALAC and MQA, and has a wide, solid case, two HDMI outputs, 4K 60p, Dolby Atmos and DTS: X for the best possible home theater experience.
The combination of Zappiti Magic Pixel V3 and VS10 Video Processing offers outstanding picture quality - far better than previous generations - with improved dynamics, precise colour reproduction, increased contrast, solid deinterlacing and better upscaling (up to 4K resolution).
Even on a Full HD 1080p TV or a front projector, you'll be amazed by the image quality of your display!
3D also offers a better sense of depth and an impressive, immersive effect.
Some Android apps are not suitable for use with the remote.
In this case, use a connected computer mouse or AirMouse (not included).
Network Playback: A special network optimization that, thanks to the SMB protocol (including HEVC UHD files), guarantees better performance for local network playback via Gigabit Ethernet or 10/100 Ethernet, regardless of the type of media.
Universal RC: Seamless integration into Smart Home installations via ready-to-use Control4 drivers, RTI drivers, Elan drivers, Crestron IP codes, Savant, ProControl, Logitech, URC, Pronto and general IP codes.
It doesn't help much as I've been waiting for it since September.
Now nothing is working at all.
My account is apparently locked and the language is English
Also compatible with all printers that use the above products, according to the manufacturer or user manual.
Over 10 years' experience as a specialist dealer in toner production
All listed company and brand names as well as all mentioned type designations are the property of the respective legal manufacturers and rights holders.
Its mention serves only as a guide, as well as to indicate the compatibility of the goods.
These are not original products of the respective printer manufacturers, but compatible goods.
Which vouchers?
I didn't get my coupon credited on my last order!
In the name of the people: Lay people pass judgement
In the courtroom, they sit in everyday clothes on the judge's bench.
However, a lot depends on their verdict, even if they don't wear a robe: Jurors, together with professional judges, decide whether and for how long someone goes to prison.
Two of them report in an interview with the "Oeffentlichen" about their time at the Bad Kreuznach Regional Court: Sascha Wickert from Boos and Ruth Ertz from Bad Kreuznach are two of the 125 lay judges at the Regional Court on John F. Kennedy Street.
Hello, unfortunately, I can't get into my customer account.
Could you please resend the invoice for order number #NUMBER# to the email address above?
Can we get rid of the packaging material?
We don't have the capacity to hold them for that length of time.
We would use the table as they offered, as if it were ours.
Gladly, I had already ordered the same chair in blue in November and also received it. Therefore, because they are so beautiful, I now have one in grey.
Does the cupboard have to be completely dismantled for collection and return?
And when would it be picked up?
The 110-kV underground cable will be newly built in 2022
The approval for the relocation of the new high-voltage cable in Tann is legally binding.
The plan approval decision of the government of Lower Bavaria clears the way for construction, which is due to begin in 2022.
The network operator Bayernwerk announced this now.
The seven-kilometre long underground cable will connect the Tann substation in the north of the municipality and the existing 110-kilovolt line between Simbach and Pfarrkirchen.
The cable will be connected to a mast of the overhead line near the village of Edermanning in Reut.
Good morning,
My order of 03.01.21 with the order number #NUMBER# has only arrived with us in part so far.
The blue Betsell number:#PRS_ORG# with the tracking number #NUMBER# was returned by #PRS_ORG# with the remark "Delivery not possible".
The other three packages have arrived, so delivery is definitely possible.
Can you tell me what happens next?
Have a good start to the week!
You can forget it, I've already explained that several times yesterday!!
This is a glass chest of drawers and all the sides have burst open, so there is glass everywhere and the box is broken
The chest of drawers is in my apartment and #PRS_ORG# refuses to come into the apartment because of the #PRS_ORG# regulations
This means the chest of drawers can't be collected as no-one is allowed into my home
Thank you for the message
but why only 20 euros?
The original value of this chair was #NUMBER# EUR
No, it's with all books, that's why I asked #PRS_ORG#, because it seems to be a general problem
Ref: Lesson planning (EK)
Hello fellow colleagues,
I have been in the Ref since the summer. I enjoy teaching, but I currently have great difficulty planning my geography lessons in a time-efficient manner.
Unfortunately, my school is not very well equipped, so I can basically only use the blackboard, the schoolbook and an OHP as a medium.
In school, I can also only copy s/w for free (which is annoying for geography).
I currently need a very long time to plan my hours.
For example, we are currently dealing with the topic of geofactors, and for me, every hour is different.
In principle, the methods are always repeated, but on the other hand, I do not want to invest too much time in simple lessons (which I also need for UBs, etc.).
I usually start planning from the learning goal (what do I want to achieve) and then think about how I can build it up (usually I create a worksheet with texts from books that my school doesn't have).
We have the book Terra, and with most of the problems in the book, I am rather dissatisfied.
That's why the worksheets too.
Perhaps a geography teacher can tell me how to work efficiently with the book.
That would make me really happy.
I would like to return the #PRS_ORG# from order #NUMBER#.
I have actually already decided on a new one with #PRS_ORG#, but I would like to settle the return as quickly as possible.
The trade fears the Christmas business due to the 2G regulation.
Only people who have been vaccinated or have recovered may enter most shops.
Retailers see this as unnecessary and complain about a decline in sales.
He also has a possible solution ready.
In the view of the German Association of the Retail Trade (HDE), the 2G regulations are spoiling the important Christmas business for the retail trade.
Turnover losses are to be expected in businesses selling non-daily necessities, criticised Stefan Genth, the HDE's chief executive.
According to a recent survey of 1,100 retailers by the HDE, more than 70 percent of companies had a negative outlook for the rest of the year.
Many had already written off the Christmas business.
"What should have been the positive highlight of the year is now often a bottomless pit," said Genth.
According to the report, retailers with 2G access restrictions lost about a third of their pre-crisis sales in the past week.
Things are only going well in the food retail sector and in the online sector.
The association demanded consequences from the dramatic development.
Shopping with a mask, distance and hygiene concept is a safe matter, said the chief executive.
"2G for shopping does not help us in the fight against the pandemic," he stressed.
The current regulations deterred customers and required a lot of staff.
He demanded that the wristband system be allowed nationwide.
After that, each customer would only have to be checked once for 2G (vaccinated or recovered) and would have access to all shops with the wristband they received that day.
In addition, spot checks should be sufficient in retail - as is already the case in public transport with the 3G rule (vaccinated, recovered or tested).
Even the property company Deutsche Euroshop, which specialises in shopping centres, spoke of a difficult Christmas business.
The frequencies last stood at around 75 per cent of the pre-corona level without 2G, and the sales at around 90 per cent.
These figures will now surely fall in the middle of the so important Christmas business", said CEO Wilhelm Wellner to the "Wirtschaftswoche".
Due to the high personnel and administrative effort, solutions are being sought and approved for the centres.
This includes the so-called wristband solution, in which "visitors, for example, can present their 2G proof at a central point in the centre and then, equipped with a wristband similar to that in a club hotel, can enter all the shops without any disturbance". dpa
I recently ordered and received the #PRS_ORG#.
The Spiegel has a scratch and the frame also has a fault, which was attempted to be covered up with a yellow filler.
That looks ugly.
I would like to return the mirror and have already put it back in the package and sealed it.
How should I proceed with the return now?
The lamp is designed for dual-balance, based on new, flat, high-power, high-CRI SMD LEDs.
A modern microprocessor is responsible for setting the colour temperature and brightness of the light, with exceptional capabilities.
In addition to the brightness adjustment, there are two standard color temperatures: daylight and artificial light.
It is also possible to set and save the color temperature manually within the range of 3100 - 5650K.
Use the current settings in Flash memory.
A special feature of the controller is that it is easy to use and intuitive.
The luminaire generates a very high light output with soft light of high quality, entirely flicker-free.
The 120° beam angle, which allows you to light up large areas from a relatively short distance, is excellent.
Incidentally, also in reporter situations in small rooms or at short intervals.
They can adjust the brightness essentially without changing the color temperature.
It's a great tool to work with both on set and in the studio.
The optional DMX512 controller allows remote control of the luminaire in TV studios or when the luminaire is mounted in hard-to-reach places.
On the back of the light is the control panel, consisting of buttons and a glowing display.
The display shows the current brightness setting in percent and the current color temperature in Kelvin.
There is also a slot for the NP-F batteries (not included)
User memory The memory has up to three panel settings for brightness and colour temperature.
To perform the settings of the individual presets on the memory locations, simply press one of the memory buttons for a longer period of time and it's done.
The storage controller saves the current state of the lamp when it is switched off, so that when it is switched on again, the familiar situation stands - very practical in studio work, for example, when the camera is set to certain colour temperatures.
Battery operation is one of the biggest strengths of the DL3120's functionality, resulting from the ability to operate on inexpensive NP-F batteries.
These are often already in the possession of photographers and cameramen (and women) - so you can make use of existing equipment.
The DL3120 can also check if the batteries have sufficient power before setting it up - it has a built-in battery tester - for each of the two battery compartments, a value in the two display screens (the left battery in the upper display, the right on the lower display).
In addition, it is of course possible to continuously supply the headlight with power via the included power supply.
The construction of the headlight is very simple.
They have a 16mm sleeve as a connection for mounting, so you can attach them directly to your camera tripod.
The inclination is reliably set using stops on both sides.
Care was taken to ensure that the mechanical components are also extremely high quality, and are therefore designed for longevity and hard use.
In addition, a tilting joint is included.
It's great that it also comes with a bag.
This way, you can safely transport or store the lamp with all the accessories that you might still want to buy.
It's a shame, I was given it as a gift and it's too small :(
"The party we wanted to throw": Frankfurt celebrates after a rich comeback against Leverkusen
What a spectacular reaction from Eintracht Frankfurt.
After 22 minutes, the last twice in a row defeated Hessen were apparently on the way to their next Bundesliga defeat.
But then SGE turned things around, shot the frustration of a mediocre start to the season out of their system within a good hour, and won furiously with 5:2. "It's crazy what the boys did today," jubilated coach Oliver Glasner at DAZN and spoke a "blanket praise, for each and every one who was there".
At first, it looked like another setback for the now ninth-ranked Frankfurters, who are still behind their expectations.
Patrik Schick had put the Leverkuseners 2-0 ahead.
What then happened also impressed the SGE coach.
"How the players then came back and played a fantastic game," continued Glasner.
I'm insanely happy with the performance we showed and of course with the result.
Even defender Christopher Lenz, who was able to stand on the pitch for the first time since the fourth round and his overcome muscle injury, emphasized the morale of his teammates.
"I think our mentality is incredible," said the 27-year-old and was especially pleased with the result for the spectators.
That was the party we wanted to throw today.
For the upcoming tasks, however, Glasner wants to keep the focus on himself, but he also sees himself well equipped in terms of personnel.
It's unusual that we have all the players fit in December, that all the players are in top physical condition.
It's top work in our medical department, but the players also live very professionally.
Now, it wants to "move forward step by step and stay modest" and carry out the tasks until the end of the year "at this level".
The next game is an away game against Borussia Mönchengladbach on Wednesday as part of the English week (6.30 p.m., Sky).
I just received an email that my package is being returned to you due to an error on my part.
I have tried to call #PRS_ORG# and get it redirected, no chance.
Can it be sent directly to me again or do I have to wait until the money is refunded and place the order again?
That would mean for me that I would not order again because it has already taken a very long time.
Have you ever sat in the #PRS_ORG# chairs?
Dampener for handball women ahead of quarter-final against Spain
After the humiliation against Denmark, Germany's handball women shuffled off the floor with their heads down and blank looks on their faces.
At the end of the World Cup main round, the DHB selection suffered a heavy defeat with 16:32 (8:13) in front of 800 spectators in Granollers and must now face the host Spain in the quarter-finals.
"We were far too scared and had too much respect for the opponent," said national coach Henk Groener.
Against Spain we have to play differently.
After their first defeat in the tournament, Germany finished the main round group III with 8:2 points as second behind the Danish team (10:0).
It's a shame that we couldn't take the flow with us.
It was a bad game for all of us that we have to wash away," said captain Emily Bölk.
In the fight for a place in the semi-finals, a clear increase is needed against the 2019 World Championship runner-up next Tuesday to keep the delicate dream of the first medal since 2007 alive.
The best German thrower in the duel with the three-time Olympic champion Denmark was backcourt player Alina Grijseels with six goals.
"We just weren't there - neither in attack, nor in defence," admitted backcourt player Xenia Smits and called for: "We have to look forward now."
Not up to it from start to finish
Unlike in the previous five tournament games, the German team was not up to the mark from the start.
Missed shots and technical errors in the attack and gaps in the defence were responsible for a quick 0:4 deficit after seven minutes.
Only goalkeeper Dinah Eckerle was immediately on operating temperature and prevented worse with some saves.
The first goal was scored by the DHB team after 9:30 minutes, when Grijseels successfully completed a quick counterattack.
This was not, however, the hoped-for ignition.
Against the aggressive defence of the Danish women, the German women could hardly get into the picture - and if they did, they mostly failed against the strong Althea Reinhardt in the goal of the Scandinavian women.
So the game was run early at 3:10 after 20 minutes, especially since backcourt player Mia Zschocke was also given a red card a short time later for a hard foul on her opponent.
In the quarter-finals, however, she is allowed to take part again.
Only in the final phase of the first half did the DHB selection play a little better and at least come within five goals of the break.
The already faint hope of a comeback after the change was gone after seven minutes at 9:19.
Once again, the Groener-Schützlinge sinned in all areas and made it easy for the well-prepared opponent, who counts as a medal candidate at the finals.
As a result, the German team was no longer able to muster a performance boost and left the floor as a clear loser.
DACH Advent Calendar Day 6: Family traditions at Christmas time
As part of the Reddit Advent calendar, we've snagged St. Nicholas Day and are using it as an excuse to talk about family traditions in the pre-Christmas period, Advent, St. Nicholas Day, Christmas Eve, and the Christmas holidays.
What was it like for you at home back then?
How about your\*partner's?
Do you want to pass on your traditions to your children?
What do the children like best?
What about the boot shining?
Baking Christmas cookies?
Decorating trees?
Will there be music?
Is it Santa Claus, the Christ Child, or is the gift from Grandma and Grandpa?
No matter how they do it, everyone makes an effort to make it as nice as possible as a family at Christmas.
Whether it's fixed traditions, or even something different every year, tell us how it went or is going in your family!
Please send me any transaction number... or anything that could help
Payment confirmation... etc.
I would like to give away a gift code
just like with #PRS_ORG# gift vouchers
How does it work for them?
The title exists, I work as a vaccination doctor in mobile vaccination teams, where (so far only) the BioNTech/Pfizer vaccine is mainly administered in nursing homes.
As these are soon to be completed to a large extent, I will then move on to the vaccination centres.
I am happy to answer questions without a time limit on the organisational and human aspects and also medical questions, as long as they are not personal (e.g. "I am taking medication X, is it compatible with the vaccination...").
My area of responsibility includes providing information about vaccinations, determining indications (a person is eligible for a vaccination according to the Corona Vaccination Ordinance and has no reasons that speak against it), medical documentation and, if necessary, emergency care in the event of allergic reactions (which has never happened to me yet).
The vaccination itself can be delegated to qualified personnel, such as medical assistants.
In vaccination teams, however, we often don't have them, but "only" (for God's sake, no lack of appreciation!) pharmaceutical-technical assistants for the preparation of vaccines, who, however, cannot perform vaccinations (are allowed to?), so that I myself perform most of the vaccinations there.
Serious "Huidlerer" question: Amberger knows the answer
What on earth is a "Huidlerer"?
With this dialect word, sent in by an Amberger, the BR television programme "Wir in Bayern" has caused a lot of thinking.
But unlike on many of the preceding days, the term remained beyond the reach of the callers in the "Host mi?" round.
No, it wasn't a "man who's nervous."
And no one who "has to do everything quickly".
People heard from the TV presenter that this was completely wrong.
This is what the man from Amberg said, and he probably caused astonishment among many people in the Upper Palatinate.
"The Huidlerer," the audience learned, "is a cloth used to wipe the oven."
Dialect researcher Antony Rowley, who has been questioned by Bavarian television as an expert for years, confirmed this.
With the remark that this is a typical Upper Palatinate term, derived somehow from the more well-known dialect word "Houdern".
This closed an educational gap - also for many people who have been living in the Amberg area for a long time.
I haven't been able to buy books for 2 weeks.
After confirmation, the following error message always follows: oops - something went wrong - try again later.
I have restarted the #PRS_ORG#, connected it to the PC, synchronised and repaired it.
Nothing helped.
Tyre choice for racing bikes - really so puncture-proof?
This morning, I woke up full of energy, because I wanted to train at least a little bit to prepare for my cycling tour next week.
Said, done, and I set off on my racing bike, which I bought yesterday on eBay.
The first 40km were also really nice - but then it happened, what lurks in every city centre (this time: thank you Krefeld!).
Glass splinters on the track.
Zack, loud hissing and my rear tyre did not want to take part in the rest of the ride at all.
As I didn't really have the possibility to get a replacement jacket and a replacement tube due to it being a weekday, I had to turn around with half-bad mood and take the first train home.
In terms of mood, it wasn't so bad either, maybe it's even better if I practice the tyre change again before the bike tour.
Now, however, I am faced with a question and I hope that you can help me.
Since I have a relatively long distance to cover over several days, I would not like to have this problem very often.
Now it wasn't really bad, because the old tyres from the previous owner (a very nice old man, who had ridden 120km by 14:00 on the day I came to pick up the bike!) were also described as sub-optimal, because he has ridden on rollers for several years with them.
However, if I think about the fact that I have to change a tyre after driving 80-90 kilometres, then I'm probably really in a bad mood :D
Now, I got into conversation with an older man at the platform, who asked me in surprise why I didn't have the Marathon Plus tyres; these are supposed to be puncture-proof.
Now, of course, the whole thing sounds very tempting.
But are they really indestructible?
I have little desire to spend 40 euros per tyre now, just to be disappointed in the end.
Furthermore, I wonder: I currently have 25x622 on my racing bike.
These are also available (apparently?) for Marathon Plus tyres, but the majority are already wider.
Is this a problem?
Or would you generally advise me to use other tyres for a racing bike?
The Schwalbe page seems to recommend the Durano DD for my absolute! layman's knowledge?
Thanks in advance for the help and best wishes!
Car smashes into tree: driver fatally injured
The 53-year-old had crashed his car into a central island for unknown reasons on the B57 between Rheinberg and Xanten and then driven onto the opposite carriageway, as the police reported.
There was a head-on collision with the vehicle of a 27-year-old.
The 53-year-old's car was then thrown into a tree and the man was trapped in the vehicle.
The 27-year-old and his 23-year-old passenger were seriously injured in the accident and taken to nearby hospitals.
Yes, we have deleted all books, authorized all new authors, and loaded new books.
Environmentally sound: The products from MOTIP DUPLI are free from health-damaging metals.
The company is committed to using formulations that do not contain regulated or questionable ingredients without affecting the best possible performance.
The caps and packaging are made from recyclable materials.
Disposal: Please only submit rest-emptied containers to the recycling.
Take containers with leftovers to the problem waste disposal site.
Labelling: All products from MOTIP DUPLI comply with the current labelling regulations.
The classification, classification, award is carried out according to GHS or CLP 1272/2008/EC in its current valid form.
The Safety Data Sheets comply with REACH 1907/2006/EC, Article 31 and Annex II in their current form.
For many DUPLI-COLOR spray paints, spray protection and break-proof closure cap prevent unauthorised use.
See the appropriate instructions on the cap or label.
Always read and observe the warning texts before use!
Will I get a confirmation email for this?
I have been assured of this three times by your colleagues...how reliable is your information?
When will the transport company contact me?
I've already written, did you not receive my SMS?
Following the launch of our new high-end broadband B 100-6 OHM, it was only a matter of time before our SOLO range would have a new addition.
The new offspring is called SOLO 15 and looks like the big role models with the B 200 - 6 OHM.
However, this construction proposal includes a suitably designed foot, which is included to raise the speaker to the correct listening position.
This has no influence on the acoustics and can thus be adjusted in length according to the circumstances at home.
The SOLO 15 is, by principle, very suitable for people for whom the maximum volume plays a rather subordinate role, but who want to achieve an exceptionally high level of sound quality.
A 10cm speaker is simply not capable of producing such high sound pressure levels without significant filtering.
This does not mean, however, that the SOLO 15 sounds weak.
On the contrary, she is impressively mature and, for her size, extremely impressive and accurate.
The SOLO 15 was tuned tonally with a slight treble boost.
This is common for wideband antennas to optimize the increasing bundling at higher frequencies.
The SOLO 15 is designed exactly for the listening position and impresses with a very clear and fine sound.
Turned slightly outwards, the high-frequency range can be reduced and the sound image can be made warmer.
Thanks to the point sound source, the localisation of the individual components of a piece of music in the optimal stereo triangle is razor sharp and surprisingly precise.
The B100-6 Ohm's reference-worthy extremely low mechanical losses result in a dynamic that is second to none.
The SOLO 15 therefore not only supplements our SOLO series, but also expands it in terms of resolution and accuracy.
As with all our kits, it's a good idea to think about the final look of the speaker at the start, to allow for any changes during construction.
If, for example, you want to veneer the case, the cut-out for the speaker must be adjusted accordingly, since the veneer adds material.
After all the plates have been cut (e.g. in the hardware store), one should first drill an 8 mm hole in the floor plate at the appropriate place, so that the cable can be passed through later without any problems.
The speaker opening in the front is now cut with the help of a router, so that the B 100 - 6 OHM can later be fitted flush.
On the back, this opening should be provided with a 45° chamfer to make the opening area of the speaker chassis inside as large as possible.
The four connection points of the B 100 - 6 OHM are interrupted in the phase, as shown in the picture "Detail Phase".
After that, you start with the actual assembly of the box and place one of the two side walls on a flat surface in front of you.
Now the back, the lid, the front and the bottom are glued on.
In this case, the three stiffeners should also be installed and glued in place.
The stiffeners themselves can vary in material strength if needed, for example if you want to use ready-made strips from the hardware store instead of making them yourself from 16 mm MDF.
In the next step, the second page is attached.
After that follow all the plates of the foot, i.e. the two sides and the front.
A suitable hole saw or Forstner bit will make it easier to attach the holes for the bass reflex tube, as well as the connection terminal on the back panel.
Next, a round-over bit is used to round all the edges of the actual box.
The upper side of the footplate can also be rounded off with it.
Following this, the footplate is firmly glued to the foot of the case and additionally screwed on with long wood screws.
This is followed by marking and pre-drilling (2.5mm drill bit) of the screw holes for the loudspeaker chassis and the connection terminal.
After the case has been cleaned of wood dust (vacuuming/blowing), one starts with the laying of the cable.
The easiest way to do this is through the 35 mm bass reflex opening in the back.
To do this, one slides the entire, uncut cable piece by piece through the 8 mm hole in the base to the terminal opening, and lets it stick out there by about 30 cm.
At the top of the case, the cable is led to the speaker opening and left to hang loosely there as well.
The frequency changer is then prepared and put into operation.
The construction plan for the frequency switch, as well as the corresponding connection plan, can be found in the following document: Assembly instructions for the Solo 15 switch.
Once the frequency changer is installed and the connection terminal is screwed in, the sealing of the 8 mm cable opening inside the box follows, which is not yet completely closed.
Through the 35 mm bASSREFLEX opening and with some skill, you can drop hot glue onto the opening and seal it.
By opening the B 100 - 6 OHM and using a small lamp, you can check the seal accordingly.
Now comes the treatment, according to the description.
Afterwards, the B 100 - 6 OHM is connected and fastened with the corresponding screws.
Polarity plays an important role here, so that the positive lead (marked cable) must be soldered to the positive pole of the loudspeaker (larger contact).
At the end, the bass reflex tube is cut to the specified length of 28 mm (total length of the tube) and inserted.
To dampen, a mat of the damping material is cut into two pieces and loosely distributed in the case.
The opening around the bass reflex channel should be kept clear.
Can I place an order now and have it delivered in early June?
> Hi everyone,
> finally, we can announce that we will be hosting OSCAST again this year!
> Unfortunately, for known reasons, we are not able to get more than four people into the studio, which means a higher planning effort and explains the short notice of the announcement.
BUT: We'll have at least three people on the switch, so we'll be streaming the Oscars 2021 with at least 7 beans and hopefully thousands of you!
> We do our best to avoid delays or other problems.
But hey, it's still a pandemic, so we'll do our best to make the Oscars as entertaining as possible.
> It will start around 0:30.
Chill some drinks, plan some good food, and get ready for a long, but very interesting night.
